did they tell homeless O'Reilly is hoarding crack and booze?
Actually digg is far less anti-semitic than reddit.
Was I the only one who pretended their cursor was a little space ship traveling at Warp 1.5?
The enemy's gate is down!
Thoughts on what a candidate goes through, and why I found it worthwhile to take a minute to consider how and why such men as these saw it fit to expend their energy for their country.
Yeah, that's why I don't really have much patience for libertarianism. Every country in the world that is considered a really desirable place to live - the Nordic countries, France, Germany, Switzerland, Australia, New Zealand, Japan, South Korea, Canada and the US - has a large, powerful federal government. Period.
Not I, Al Gore won, Nader was the best candidate for the job in 2000.
I, for one, would gladly send our socialists to Norway. However, I do not know if they would go as they seem to devise most of their satisfaction from forcing their schemes on others rather than experiencing them theirselves.
That's why everyone loves Israel.
If you think that Paul's economic policies will help move you into the middle class, your OUT OF YOUR MIND. Laissez-faire economics destroy the middle class. Look at all the other nations in the world, with higher standards of living, ask yourself "What do they do that we dont"? I can promise that it is FURTHER away from Paul's policies. The trouble is that Ron Paul's policies are already dominating the economy, the "american dream" is actually a lie.  Its a fiction about consumption and the invisible hand of the market, about hard-work helping you get ahead. All a lie.  The truth is you economic warfare has been waged by the rich for the rich in the USA, and they have won. The Government is run by the Plutocracy.  And, Paul's plan of destroying the government and turning everything over to the market is the wet dream of the *EXISTING* corrupt thieves who dominate the nation.
There's a better one on there.  But anyway, Viking funerals are absolutely the only way to pay tribute to a dead hamster.
"Ever heard of a trailer?"  ever heard of a truck? or are those only for fags, Mr. Oblivious Ass?
They peaked at Florida since the Democrat's votes there did not count...
My computer doesn't have a reset button. Though that's a little disingenuous because the reset button has now been replaced by holding the power button for 4 seconds, then booting cold.
&gt;(worldwide) Total donations made at a parish level in 2003 were $8 billion said Harris.  From  http://www.msnbc.msn.com/id/7558375/
&gt;Immediate withdrawal or GTFO.  Either withdraw immediately *or* get the fuck out… o_O
Neither is the "a"
If you haven't violated anyone's civil liberties, then I'm sure you would have no trouble telling everyone exactly what you did.   Oh wait, that's right, 5 million 'lost' emails,  claims of executive privilege, an a push for immunity - cause when you haven't broken the law, you need immunity.
those warriors can offtank in case anything happens to the main tank (sheep, sleep, entangle, dead).
Buick Malibu writes: &gt;Alternately, the pristine assholes who think they're better than everyone else because they don't smoke, but put any number of carcinogenic things into their body, via their fat facehole, on a regular basis... including the heavily polluted air they breath... and die just as frequently... study nowhere to be found....   [Evidence to the contrary](http://www.newstarget.com/021071.html) [More evidence to the contrary](http://www.cancer.org/docroot/NWS/content/NWS_1_1x_Eating_Lots_of_Red_Meat_Linked_to_Colon_Cancer.asp) You seem a little uptight, maybe you should smoke some weed.
What is a conspiracy?  The line is blurring it seems.  Is fabricating evidence to take us to Iraq a conspiracy?  
1K a month? You can do better, kaens. Grab the currents and try to go where the lucrative gigs are, in the appropriate language. I know I'm a stickler for sticking with one language, but really, you can find a mainstream language and still love at least one variety out there. Honestly, I mean I don't see a lot of guys doing Lisp for websites. Get more peer review of your work using forums. Improve your skills with textbooks or perhaps a workshop or two.
my, endless loooove
Send them a youtube of a fox broadcast, same thing.  Koss is a response to rush limbaugh, ann coulter and fox news.  We let them do that shit for like ten years before admitting you had to fight bullshit with bullshit.  
&gt; His power was limited vis-a-vis the other senators.  Which affirms my conclusion that he had no clout with them.  &gt; Ergo, the current state of affairs is precisely what Clinton wants. She would change nothing.  I agree, neither will Obama though. He could have rallied the democratic majority to his cause and just let the Patriot Act expire, but he didn't. So this means that he believed the Patriot Act to be worth saving or that he lacked the power to effect change.   You argument is then that Clinton doesn't want any change, well I don't see Obama as wanting it either. If he really wanted change, he would say no to the Patriot Act. legalize drugs and pull out of Iraq immediately. He would then make these statements and then compromises short of them. However his rhetoric starts at the compromised position and then makes further compromises.  I think you're secretly hoping he fully supports the ideal position (no war, no patriot act), but is afraid to speak freely, for fear of losing whatever clout he does have. Not a very strong position for you to be in to merely be hoping that he does the right thing and surprises everyone by going to the ideal position after election. If he sticks to what he says he'll do, you're still short of the position you want to be at.
Well, speeding isn't a "criminal offence", I don't get a criminal record, or risk jail time unless something else (hit someone) comes of it. However it isn't legal.  Decriminalization != Legalization  It should, because then it can be taxed, but Marijuana could stop carrying criminal charges and remain "illegal"
Because PACs with many millions of dollars will soon be making TV ads touting the ranking.
But who else could qualify as creationists' peers?
The blog is [here](http://www.tsa.gov/blog).  Good luck with that No-fly List complainers.
Damn, I really do miss Molly Ivins!
http://www.ccny.cuny.edu/library/languages.html#arabic  http://www.fsi-language-courses.com/Arabic.aspx  http://technorati.com/videos/tag/learn+arabic  http://opalmyth.com/01/2008/at-last-new-list-of-updates-from-free-language  http://freelanguage.org/
Bill Reilly's nephew is enrolled, according to him. Since I am a patriot like Billy, I will send my nephew in, too. My sister owes me $50 from 5 years ago anyways.
Tell it to Knuth, without his typeface naziness we may never have had TeX.
I was told at MIT the average debt was $400k.
Hrithiktheactor.com : Indian Actor Hirthik Roshan Latest Movies,Movie Videos,Latest News,Biography,Wallpapers, Photogallery,Profile , Filmography Videos, Songs...
http://news.bbc.co.uk/1/hi/world/middle_east/6725931.stm  Yeah. This story will NEVER make the mainstream news.  Its because the same stuff gets recycled by the poster to further their agenda.  Feel free to down mod yourself for not actually looking for the story.
For [those users with social skills who know how to de-escalate a potential conflict](http://sittingin.bicycling.com/2008/01/confronting-the.html?cm_mmc=BicyclingNL-_-2008_01_31-_-Blog-_-Sittingin) it's a _great_ solution.  For [those users who would just make use of the opportunity to verbally spit on others](http://reddit.com/info/678t6/comments/c031xgv), it increases conflict.  For those users who would just use it to chat with everyone else, it's [dangerous](http://thesis.lib.cycu.edu.tw/ETD-db/ETD-search/view_etd?URN=etd-0119107-153854).
Nor do many Americans. In fact, it's one of the things that bothers me most about him.
&gt;""In fact, if there is one thing that could bankrupt America, it's runaway health care costs. We must not allow that to happen," David M. Walker, the U.S. comptroller general...."  Seriously, is this fuckstink joking?
http://news.bbc.co.uk/1/hi/world/middle_east/6725931.stm
Or I could pay attention, that works too.
Insatiable is unsustainable. Not everyone in the world plans to live like you.
You aren't allowed to smoke OUTSIDE in Alberta?? That's messed up.  If my brother lived in lberta he's be screwed. His wife won't let him smoke inside because of the kids and he wouldn't be able to smoke outside either...maybe he could smoke in his car but...if ontario gets their way, he can't do that either. Guess he's lucky he lives in BC...where you just can't smoke in indoor public places like restaurants and bars. 
Actually, fuck all those companies.  The alarm companies are profiting off of your tax dollar.  You can read more about it in David Cay Johnston's book called "Free Lunch", or in an interview with him here: http://prairieweather.typepad.com/the_scribe/2008/01/free-lunch-davi.html
the cornucopia of spam was the nail in the coffin for me
EPIC FAIL
I thought one of the big reasons people cycle was for health... you should be happy for the extra exercise;)
Jeepers creepers! Could you BE more pretentious? 
I bet it's way easier to get published there than in Nature.  Maybe I should change my research focus...
And is 300x bigger then his penis.
only one?
Im taking Admiral Ackbar's shtick here, but i have to say it. IT'S A TRAP!
Yes, and remember that folks in Europe love us USA developers right now. We're like 1/3 to 1/2 off on discount to them, and we turn out good quality, speak more clearly, actually care about helping them, and don't have infrastructure issues. We're not paki's.  BTW, did you hear that much of India went offline last night? Yep. Someone cut a cable. Egypt was affected even more. That's a shitty infrastructure. In fact, the paki's have to work only at certain times of the day because the power cuts off, and several of them have to leave for prayer like 2-3 times a day. Ridiculous.
Your old car would have to be really bad to compensate for the emissions from building a new car.  Besides, you can modify a new car to produce more pollution just as you can fix up an old car to produce less.  So the age of a car is no judge in its polluting ability.
reddit has had a few high scoring links to Ha'aretz in the past.
Read the link to the actual news article.  The guy admitted to having pot.  Next unfounded conspiracy please?
well it's about damn time something legit was done about that. who drives a SUV in london anyways
I thought 12 was the minimum age to use reddit, not 9 ...
...or a Slashdotter.
Yeah, I know some people do.  But if you want the privilege of driving a vehicle that is inefficient and is a horrible polluter then you should pay through the teeth for that privilege, imho. 
It does when you infringe on my rights by destroying the environment, ruining my air, and furthering global warming just so you can keep up with the Joneses.
I guess it would be a waste of effort to remind you that, unlike Hezbollah, the Israeli forces were targeting the source of the Katyusha rockets and not civilians?  What was Hezbollah targetting?
http://news.bbc.co.uk/1/hi/world/middle_east/6725931.stm Original story.  You can decide for yourself.  It's fucking disgusting that after several hours, and tons of comments not one person bothered to look for an actual objective story.
So Gee, Bill! How about some verifiable evidence as to how Bin Laden made 3 steel buildings fall directly into their own foorprints in the same day using only fire. Heck, we can put every professional demolition expert out of a job, all we need is a little know how, Bill!
I....hate...bell curves
in Mexico
The logic of this sentence astounds.
ron keeps using that analogy to explain blowback by stating what if we were attacked here. i think he should rephrase that and say, the united states is a country of good people who have always believed we don't enter wars unless we're attacked. we were attacked on 9/11 and suddenly the country wanted blood. he should explain that the 3,000 people that died on 9/11 is nowhere near the over 100,000 dead iraqi civilians. is it not understandable that good people will want blood? 
Yeah, I just saw a Noam Chomsky video where he describes on 9/11/1973, the CIA / American government overthrew the Chilean govt and installed Pinochet, a ruthless dictator. I think 700,000 people died on that first 9/11, and most Americans don't even know about it, while most South Americans call ours "the second 9/11".  I cringe everytime Bush talks about spreading democracy, while his best friends are Putin, Musharif, King Abdullah, and Olmert...
I don't.  But if i did I could get a ticket.
What an odd game, the only way to win is not to play
I'd bet dollar to donuts that police officers are an exception to that law.
The article could use a glossary for foreigners. What do these words mean: desi, maa, beti, bahu?
And [Ross Perot spoiled the 1992 Election that Bush Sr. would have won...](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/U.S._presidential_election,_1992) but until we enact a runoff system that will happen sometimes.
McCain "finished 894th out of 899 at the Naval Academy"?  Holy shit that is bad, but I guess one should include the number that washed out because at least he graduated.  But still.
I don't see what this says about McCain's policies.
I just pissed myself.
I'm not certain.  I feel certain that whatever limited symbolic processing system I come up with to explain it will be flawed. Godel and Turing gave me that. Recursing down that argument leads me to feel that there isn't any teaching or system of thinking that will achieve anything. I can see the great harm that self-conscience humans do to their world but I don't see any of us waking up fast enough to make changes. I assume that nature has a way of working these things out. (usually death)  Maybe if we collectively realize that any action that our minds come up with leads to ruin (for ourselves and all other forms of life on this world), we'll all wake up at the same time. With the technology we have combined with a human population freed of petty distractions, we could do great things.  But I'm fairly certain that outside events will be the driver of this change, not any path. We tried universal love in the 60's and that didn't work. Apparently we are trying to see if universal fear works. It just may, but not in a way that any of us can predict.
I wonder if you would say that to my face.
But he's black so he gets a pass...
&gt;The original theme was that it happens all the time here, not necessarily that it happens at the same rate as in the 3rd world.  I said "happens in the 3rd world all the time".  intellectual replied "It happens in the 1st world all the time, too."  So no.  &gt;50,000 annually is "all the time".  50,000 go through the US, though [14,000 come into the US](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Trafficking_in_human_beings#Extent).  That is not "all the time" for a population of ~300mil.  You would be better off looking into child abuse I am guessing.  &gt;That many people indicates it is a frequent common occurrence.  You are lacking a sense of scale.  &gt;So what if some writer or anyone else is surprised at the magnitude of the problem, does that make it less severe or common.  Sure it does.  If an editor of a mainstream US news source chooses the title of an article about child abuse in America and chooses "child abuse in the US increases", that suggests that child abuse is more commonly a problem in the US than if the editor says "child abuse?  *in America?*".  Anyways the facts speak for themselves.   &gt;I'm sure rich kids on spring break in Cancun have no idea of the infant mortality rate of urban poor babies, does that mean the death rate isn't ridiculously high.  knowledge of rich kids on spring break in Cancun != title chosen by editor of mainstream US publication
They actually replaced everyone there with propagandists.  Happened to a degree with PBS as well.
The war has been most of that kid's life.
It makes more sense to report it stolen and burn it to the ground in the City Hall parking lot.
Seriously, why is this on Reddit?  EDIT:  Ah, I see... you're promoting your blog...
Quick! How often do you need 2 tanks in a 5 man? Right... the final boss of Uldaman... and also ... never. So we don't need OTs in 5 mans... and even if we did, that's what hunter/lock pets, shaman, rogues, and druids are for. When a warrior enters a group and says "Duh ... derrr.... so... who's tankin'? Duh....", just know that we're all laughing at them.
60 kph.
I wouldn't be surprised if miscaviage/cruise mailed these themselves.   Scientology is losing the war, and will use any dirty tactic in the book to bring down anon. anon is in a fight with an opponent that fights very dirty
Decriminalisation has to be the first step.  Ask 10 people off the street whether it should be legalised, and you'll get a sensible 3 or 4 that say definitely yes. Ask if it should be de-criminalised, and you'll get 4 or 5, and maybe even a slightly reluctant 6th. You'll never get legalisation straight off. Support decriminalisation, because it'll never be legal otherwise. Excuse me now, time to roll a phat one....
There are Christians who believe it's justified to kill in the name of God. That doesn't mean Jesus Christ supported killing the infidels.  These "Christians" are wrong.  Their misguided belief doesn't change the nature of the organization they claim to belong to. Similarly, just because some libertarians try to justify their anti-choice views, that does not mean anti-abortionism is a libertarian viewpoint.  Measures outlawing abortion would, by necessity, be so invasively statist that I cannot see how a true libertarian would be able to stomach them. The fact is, anti-abortion measures would require the state *forcing* a woman to harbor within her body a life she does not want and which is surviving by being a parasite on her body.  In certain situations, if the pregnancy goes badly (like some pre-eclampsia cases) it would mean the state forcing the woman to stay *in bed* for weeks, unable to do anything, out of fear of harming the creature inside her the state is forcing her to harbor. This.  Is.  Not.  Libertarian. Period.
Check.
Lots of people don't understand that the pedals in a car are analog, not digital.
Okay,  So, 15% of poor white boys in England are achieving a 'good' average in their major exams. 45% of white boys from more affluent homes achieved a good average. 36% of poor kids of East Indian descent achieved a good average. 52% of poor kids of Chinese descent achieved a good average.  A liberal democrat's response to the news: "We should be ashamed to live in a country where there is such a huge gap between rich and poor children."  Now this information is misleading because the first two stats use 'boys' whereas the next two stats examine 'kids' in general (I'm assuming they looked at both boys and girls). I'm not sure how much the girls, if included, would have pushed up the stats but unless they pushed them up by more than 5% then it's really odd that the general Government and Press sentiment is that the government needs to do more for the kids.  After all, the poor children of Asian descent are doing better than the affluent white boys. So, doesn't it make more sense to say that something is happening in the home that is creating the difference and that it isn't a government problem??? Dang, I don't know why responsibility has to always fall to the government. It'd be different if the stats showed poor kids doing worse than affluent kids but the stats actually show poor Asian kids doing better than affluent white boys! Yet, still the government is to blame... Never even a single mention of parental responsibility...tsk tsk...
Oh yeah. Let's also create reddit.com/r/hypertexts.
You have obviously never tried to drive up a snow covered hill with a rear wheel drive van.
An increase from 2 companies to 3 is not a 33 percent increase!!
&gt;. They beat and interrogated him, but McCain only offered his name, rank, serial number, and date of birth. That statement is not true. McCain, himself, has admitted that after four days he started cooperating and he exchanged miltary information for hospital care. I don't fault him for that, as I would probably do the same thing, I just don't like all this "superhero" mythology.
I'm sure he also wanted the US to turn into a police state as well. 
gridlock: don't get angry at the cityplanners... no... point a gun at the jerk who cut you off!
The submitter has no interest in finding the truth. He already submitted this seven months ago.  Submitter reposted in the attempts to further the agenda.  Look at the submission history. Also, there is a BBC article that no one has linked to.  http://news.bbc.co.uk/1/hi/world/middle_east/6725931.stm
Do you mean "You're" mom, youremom?  
It's from 5/06. Just a glimpse back to the past to highlight this moron's stupidity.
I'm sure he pays plenty of tax on the jet fuel he uses.
The mentally defective appear to be their peer group
Why would anybody need a V-8 Sedan anyway?  
Here is America.
Nobody expects the vaginal inquisition. Our chief weapon is fear and surprise. No, sorry. I'll come back in again...
it sounds about right so i tend to believe you. i was just messin with ya
People don't get SUVs to be economical.
Maybe it's because I'm on linux, but AVEC's kerning is perfect.  Yep, just checked and the kerning is screwed in both FF and in Safari on OSX (the top of the V starts at the same pixel as the bottom of the A).  It's perfect on FF Linux.  edit, here are some screenshots for you: http://codeplusplus.blogspot.com/2008/01/web-font-shorts.html
I cant believe it, only one McLovin post.
Cincinnati, according to [Wikipedia]( http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Jerry_Springer) (the glorious beacon of accuracy that it is).
The oil to power it and your money to afford it - those things are going away.  Deal with it.
Bush didn't create the problems, he just made them worse. It would have gotten worse no matter who was elected, though I think Gore might not have been as bad... obviously.
Chill out, yea that's what people have been doing and that's how they got to pay over 50% of their fucking income to government. Maybe more "chilling out" will fix things. 
I look past most of the conspiracy theories and look at who gained the most from the attacks.  HINT: It was not Al Qaeda. And you know those freedoms they hated us for? Most of those are gone now, too.
I do, I love that show.
I see your point and you're right.   Plug and play graphics is still a way off until xorg learns how to rehash its settings without throwing itself upon its own sword.
OK, you caught me concern trolling.  :-)  I'd like nothing more than for the Republican party to completely disintegrate into ineffective warring factions.  But I'd happily settle for Republicans becoming *real conservatives* instead of warmongering kleptocrats in theocrat drag.  Let's take our parties back!  I'll race ya!
Al Gore SHOULD HAVE won. Unless we're dealing with paralell realities he didn't actually win. If Nader had stayed out Al Gore would have actually won too.
5) Sociopathic, egomaniacal, hyper-selfish, empathy-less, ignorant and delusional Ron Paul hyper-fans.
Saying you will pull out the troops or not threaten Iran is a bit premature if you don't have access to intel.  And before you bring out the incorrect intelligence that GW was using, remember that they "massaged" that info before releasing it, so who the hell knows what was really being said by the CIA in briefings? It seems like most of the intelligence info was saying that there were no nukes and GW just chose to ignore it.
They are some evil bastards alright.
statistic of the week
He'll easily close that gap by Feb 5th, especially since edwards dropped.
Because her brother and his family live there.
He's not autistic. Autism does not exist. The correct term is 'degraded being'. It is caused by thetans.
Baaaa. Baaaa.
Note where he was found:  Afghanistan  What if all the soldiers in Iraq had been sent to afghanistan instead? How far along would the war on terror be now?
What do you consider to be the solid evidence?
I would have thought Ha'aretz is pretty inflential and respected as a "serious" paper though, both inside and outside Israel. It's certainly a mistake to think American Jews haven't heard of it. Point in hand, [Shimon Peres blogs for them.](http://www.haaretz.com/peres) When I become President I will definately have a presidential blog, hosted right here on Reddit.
&gt; Sit zazen and watch.  Why?  That's the belief.  That you *should* in the first place.  If it were not the case that you should do these things, would not all people be enlightened?
Good luck getting grant funding for THAT study! "Geez, I dunno, Dr. Smith, the hourly rate for your lab assistant seems to be pretty high for a 20 yr. old girl without a highschool education - are you sure the decimal is in the right place?"
United States military &gt; Rest of the world military
"they've made it very difficult and unintuitive to access the advanced settings on a lot of things" Deja vu there - that was the problem we all had when XP came out. Everything was easier to get to under Win2K, and XP tried to hide things (for example system files and control panels) from the users to make it simpler for them. This is just going further down the same road, and we got used to that, and I'm sure we'll get used to this.
I'm saying without the fund and its related investments the economy would be even *more* dependent on oil and gas.  My field is law, and I can tell you that without all the biotech money flowing into the area, partially funded by the HTF, there would be virtually no IP law work in the city.  (Calgary would still have a decent amount of oil and gas-related engineering IP work.)  I don't understand your claim about the Heritage Trust Fund being "looted" at all... there have never been withdrawls of principal, even when the province was running massive deficits.  It took restraint not to loot it then, but they held steady.  I agree with you though that a slowdown is imminent, caused by the collapse of natural gas prices over the last year and the inevitable implosion of the housing market (that implosion is just in its beginning stages).
HE'S DEAD! AND A CIA ASSET!
They could of atleast gone to look at it and see what it is before they said there is a bomb.
Opera's javascript is also generally slower than Firefox's, at least when DOM manipulation is involved.  For instance, I have to switch to Firefox to use Google Maps.  And the same goes for an internal app I made - it's about two or three times slower at creating DOM elements. Aside from that, I prefer Opera now. (I should qualify that I'm using 9.25, not the 9.50 beta, which crashed a lot last time I tried it)
Alright, since you don't seem to be following the conversation:  1. Says truck is convenient for city and country driving. 2. I say a Subuaru is probably better for both. 3. You say you can't put an ATV on the back of a Subaru. 4. I say you can easily put it on the back of a trailer. 5. You ask if I've heard of trucks.  See #1.
Keep driving your stupid SUVs and none of us will be breathing!
but what is the cost of storing a trailer?
Funny, I always use literal dictionaries, curly braces and all.  I only use dict() if I'm building a dictionary from (key, value) pairs, eg. by generator expression.
Oh crap, that's what I was bidding on?
It's a sticky situation legally, but if you've already consented to an evaluation, and they have reason to think you might hurt yourself (even if it's a bit shaky, or coming from an overly concerned parent), you're probably going to be detained until they feel you're not a danger to yourself.  Yes, it sucks, and it feels tyrannical. A close friend went through something similar, and one of the first things I learned is that someone with a serious psychological problem learns quickly to be a consummate liar when confronted about it. A medical professional who deals with psych patients all day sees people either in denial or attempting to hide their illness *constantly*, so you can hardly blame them for not taking you at face value once you've indicated that there might be a problem.  Again, yes it sucks and can feel like you're not being treated fairly, but they're ultimately there to look out for you.
No where in my message did I say that the book ENDORSES non-apostrophy use. I (and the book) said that people don't use the apostrophy in text messages.  And it may be a simple rule but you may be hard pressed to find a teenage who knows the difference between it's and its. 
I'm sure I'm not the first to say this, but as a cyclist myself... if cyclists expect drivers to respect them, then the cyclists need to show they respect the drivers.  If you want to claim you on your bike have the same rights on the road as someone driving a car, then you better be willing to accept that you also have the same responsibilities, which includes heeding traffic control devices.
&gt; People differ, of course. What's good for me is not good for everyone.  Well, not me. I don't want to be a sheeple without a life. I've done too many years of that, am now 41, and I call the shots from here on out.
I bike plenty.  I also respect the rules of the road!  And believe me, while it doesn't burn my thighs, I F'ing HATE coming to full stops in my car.  But I have to do it -- or so the police officer told me when he handed me a ticket.  Sorry, but you can't ask to be respected as a bicyclist while selectively exempting yourself from the rules.
do you has a flavor?
Side effects.  I took Zoloft a while back and it was exactly like this article described.  A huge chunk of the young, male population of Japan on this shit could help explain what's going on.
Fallacy.  Amazingly enough, even with the book open to the public, the Fundamentalist movement of Christianity makes an amazing amount of money in donations. They also sell books, but the 'teachings' are there.   (Note : I disagree with most organized religion so I am trying to remain neutral in approaching this question.)  Bringing the teachings into the public domain is not a question of money, it is a question of context.  If in secret, you confide that you are trying to save the world from an Alien Entity, and that we are souls trapped down with 'Sin' on this planet... A person would think you crazy, but if you ply them with pseudo-psychology, make them bare their soul to you and give some advice. Draw them into your ranks so to speak, and then confide that you have the secrets that will help them deal with the problems (That you've so greatly expounded upon, making seem immeasurable and horrible to deal with alone.) and then slowly, (For money) reveal the secrets. It's easier to get them to believe... Because its one crazy at a time, at a cost.  This is also an organization we're talking about, one that does incredibly little charity (The only 'charity' I can seem to find related to them, are free Thetan testing, and analysis... Which, is just an attempt to recruit.)  So, while you're argument is interesting, it is erroneous. You link prosperity, and their teaching (The two have nothing in common, if their teaching was on the level they could bring it to the forefront and say. "Here is this teaching, we will give it to anyone who wants it, you don't have to donate..." and those whose lives are changed, would donate... That is the way of most religious organizations.   It is simply more profitable to keep it secret, charge an assload, and have famous faces draw the lines for you...   "Religion is a great business." Hubbard said something along these lines...  "I know its rigged, but its the only game in town." and it seems apt.
It's a delegate game, and Obama is in the lead! YEAH!
What place are you hanging out where men coming in the door suddenly climax? 
poor dieting is the main cause. god bless the us
Alright, I'll play along;  Who do you think planned and carried out the attacks of 9/11/2001?
i think that was lisa (yeardley smith)
surely a sly reference to prostate exams.  and he's right.
preemptively downvoted.
probably because it was already posted, not in the politics subreddit, or everyone just hates you.  J/K :)  Also remember: everything on new page is automatically downvoted by cabals and bots and people trying to get their submissions to float.  never take anything on the internet personally.
Sorry, misread your comment. Disregard, etc.
Bah weep granah weep ninni bong
And make sure she remembers to answer to "Jose."
It's £25, not $50. Can we pretend this is an international site for a second?  It's not SUV owners (SUVs are typically called offroad or 4x4's in the UK anyway), it's high emission vehicles.  It's not a tax, it's a fee/toll you only pay on days you drive through and you have to pay in advance or within a short period of driving.  It's to drive in certain parts of Central London (although it is expanding to a few more districts)  Also you can be exempt from the charges if you live within or close to the charge zone
they are ALL cults
What details it does have are misleading at best.  For instance, it claims that the police broke down his door when he was sleeping.  This is an odd claim, considering they link to an actual news article that says the officer was in the process of entering when he was shot.
Not really surprising at all.  Back in the caveman days, men would (and most likely did) just bonk a woman on the head, drag her to his cave and have his way with her.  It's only through men obeying the rules of modern society that we don't go around doing that.  The current social structure is what empowers women.  Without it, it'd be back to bonking heads and dragging back to caves.
Six of one, half a dozen of the other....
I'm sure they will try, but there are far more people with their eyes open nowadays
hear! hear!
&gt; I find it strange that someone can be "a (popular) speaker on the Holocaust.  I dunno...I mean, she does have her own wikipedia entry. So....
About your last thought.. being 18+ does give you plenty of legal rights, but that autonomy can be overridden if a more qualified person believes that you're a threat to yourself (I assume, depending on the Mental Health Act).  Legally, and I'm not a lawyer, I'd guess its the hospital workers who made decisions for you (based on their appraisal of your mother's words).
I suppose that's one good thing about McCain. He's against torturing--um excuse me "Advanced Interrogation". I can't believe we have a politically correct way of saying torture to benefit neocons, anyway, McCain is against it. Too bad he's on board with just about everything else the neocons want for their vision of how the future should be.
God damn it you are so right.
d'oh!
I hope not.  I commented.  But it's moderated, so... I'm waiting for my post.  HA!  You're probably right... IT'S A TRAP!  Well... I like driving more instead of flying anyway.
Obviously it's often safe.  But you'll still be ticketed for it.  And when a see a cyclist doing it in front of me simply because they "can", they lose my respect.
This snow is beautiful. I'm glad global warming never happened.   Actually, it did. But thank God nuclear winter canceled it out. (Hmm, maybe we should say "Thank god Solar Magnetic Lows canceled it out"? :D)
How many votes does this billionaire have? Nothing is changed. Ron Paul is finished in five days.
Aren't you a good little bumper sticker liberal.
uh... no, not even close to the most Liberal.
check out faith fighter www.molleindustria.org/faith-fighter
As I said, to think that love for one's child is attachment is not necessarily the correct way to understand that, because love is not attachment, but can be its opposite.  But to the degree that there is attachment, then the story of the [mustard seed](http://www.google.com/search?client=safari&amp;rls=en&amp;q=buddha+mustard+seed) is the closest to something dealing with that that I am aware of.  One must accept death as a part of life. Beyond that, one should grieve, because it is human to grieve, but one should not cling to grief.  There is a Zen koan about a monk questioning a Zen master crying at a funeral that illustrates this pretty well, but I don't recall the exact story.
Good Job.
There's a reason they don't sit jury members whose minds are made up before hearing the facts of the case.
Well spotted, DaJibbs.
&gt; there is no causation logically suggested by that statement.  Exactly. We need to stop making inferences when it comes to the media. We should take things 100% literally so that we don't get any of the bias being impressed upon us. When we just look at the information, as opposed to opinion, it also allows us to be more critical. From this article, we have no idea if he was already getting canned, so we don't have enough information to take any stance.
soft on crime soft on crime soft on crime soft on crime soft on crime
I care more about them doing it in the first place than them not apologizing.
McCain: Mr. President, in 12 hours I will destroy Washington D.C. with this giant laserrr.
It's funny - nearly everyone I know believes global warming is occurring, yet they don't know how, why, or to what extent.
Wow lol, never thought about it like that.  We'll try again.  Immediate withdrawal or DIAF.
I never see arguments like yours addressing the fact that everyone likes to be in a good mood and no one likes to be in a bad mood. Add into that the fact that most people aren't typically happy with their lives, and you've got a demand right there for a media that tells us that everything is OK and hey look at Britney's horrible mess of life.
My son got one of their phones for Xmas. Lets just say if his phone is the best Motorola can produce, I can see why they're getting out of the phone business.
well then thank frickin god we've cranked up the global warming.  this might just balance out.
In the language of my people, "sheeple" is a synonym for "downmod."
The college where Ron Paul is speaking, did you even RTFA?
Ironically enough, the Japanese say they're "going", not "coming".  So perhaps the article should have said they come without going.   
Please shut the fuck up you pompous ass.
&gt;The person who thinks they're so great that they should denigrate the honest admissions of others is not a person I want around.  Good news: You get the nomination for Philospher-King of Reddit.  Bad news: You're doomed to an eternity of moderating posts and comments. Sisyphus-ish. (Say that 3 times fast.)
That's all? Are the other 88% stupid or do they just not give a sh*t?
Because all your base are belong to us!  Ok, so now you are saying the karma points should roll in, right? :-)
I don't get it.
Sadly, I can. :(
i think he was just a regional VP.
If you scroll through it really fast, it kind of looks like you're flying through space. Give it a shot.  Oh, don't forget to add drugs.
Not until you change that nick. Damn. 
the tramampoline appears to have fox magnets inside its netting
drivers licenses with two peoples heads on it ok. VIBRATORS ARE ILLEGAL IN MISSISSIPPI, LIKE ILLEGAL AS IN DRUGS! http://reddit.com/info/67acm/comments/
Great site to download Hannah Montana Best of both Worlds!  I did and Im very happy with the quality!
glorious. absolutely glorious
The difference is one is a news show, the other is a talk show. They are held to different standards. When someone looks for unbiased information on important recent events they turn to news. When someone looks for mindless entertainment with possibly a hint of information Montel, Maury, and Jerry are where to go. Those who can't discern news from the Montel show have far deeper issues than their choice in entertainment.
I've been puzzled about this for a long time, especially why it shows up on my recommended page so frequently. Not just one of the stories, but all of them.
Me too.  An informant alone, with no other information, is not enough for reasonable articulable suspicion (the standard for an officer to stop and question a suspicious person).  A warrant (probable cause) has an even higher standard of proof.
Tarquin Fin-tim-lin-bin-whin-bim-lim-bus-stop-F'tang-F'tang-Olé-Biscuitbarrel  [Monster Raving Loony Party](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Official_Monster_Raving_Loony_Party)
Bollocks.
Oh i don't. I'm just kinda new to submitting things here. So I was simply curious.   thanks for pointing out my lack of using the politics subreddit.  I'm used to the world hating me.  Woe-is-me.  ;)
[2004](http://www.nytimes.com/2006/07/03/us/03mccain.html) according to a 2006 NYTimes article, featuring the quote "He calls me Johnny Mac."  *edit*: Voted down for providing accurate information, with source, on the subject of this submission?  Thanks, Reddit!
The flak is probably directed not so much at the people who initially discovered it so much as the city administration who continued to claim that this was a serious issue even after its ridiculousness was exposed.
thank you, stupid range rovers and the angry mums driving them.  nice to see economics at work like this
I understand the measurements quite well, and that is the reason I question them - along with many other scientists. Anybody with an IQ above 30 can look at a graph and recognize an upward or downward trend. I think you’re being too innocent in your evaluation of these presentations, however. The reality is that the Earth’s climate is immensely complex and still not fully understood. Just because a group of scientists generate a graph doesn’t make it accurate. History is filled with examples of scientific error – such as the belief in the 70s that the Earth was cooling. There are also many agendas (on both sides of this issue), and therefore many motivations to present biased data.
East Germany =! Nazis, East Germany = Commies
IT would be also much more cost-effective to just not brake when the next cyclist decides that there are multiple shades of green on a traffic light. But you wouldn't want them to screw the rules either, would you?
As well, I also wanted to say that for me, the name of the game is to do websites and find out how others are making money, then get sites of my own up that duplicate or combine some of these concepts (only better). As well, if I can get **[AM projects](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Affiliate_marketing)** working in auto-pilot like PlentyOfFish.com, I can say *Fuck Everybody* and live off the monthly check, moderating the moderators at 10 hours a week. So I'm glad the ivy-league richboy poser sheeple of the world are stuck at the plant. Makes more room for us freelancers in everywhere that they're not.
You don't see what you choose not to see.
All Senate members have aids. Who else would do their laundry and relay messages?
I'm sorry, but if a record has no historical accuracy or empirical veracity then I think that it in no way should be treated with reverence or respect, unless the underlying philosophy within demands it.  The bible does not, for me, meet these conditions.  &gt;and to transcend the limits of our primitivistic, superstitious, tribalist lizard brain mentality.  I would argue that the Bible in fact promotes a primitivistic, superstitious, tribalist, lizard brain mentality.  Read anything in the old testament, that is pretty much an accurate description of the lifestyle that is described as an ideal one.  I mean the myth of the Christian tradition, composed of a number of lesser myths:  That there is a God who cares about people;  That there was a man named Jesus who was similar to the way we represent him today;  That this man was some kind of metaphysical 'son' of the aforementioned god;  That said man died and came back to life;  That the collection of books we call the bible has any relation to the actual events of the life of the man called Jesus.  I could go on, but basically i feel that every point of philosophy that the Christian faith is based on is either outright false, unprovable, or a myth.
You're my little bitch.
I felt the same way about my Nader posts, but I'm quite aware how many filthy Democrats there are trolling Reddit.  Campaigning for third party candidates gets you screamed/spit at and threatened by Democrats and applauded by Republicans, not because any of them know what they're talking about, but because voting for the party that wins feels safer than voting for the candidate who represents people, not special interest.  It's a race, not an election in this country. 
I am not sure, but I think he is referring to the time before WW2.
you can't make [] brackets parse.  However, adding syntax like [], : and ~ kills arc for generalized macros.
&gt; Just use some common sense...  Well I did minor in physics in college, so hopefully I can apply a little more than simple common sense. Even if the owners of the magazine are behind a conspiracy, I can still reason out a proper answer. Like when the MSM ignores Paul, I can reason out why and how their bias is. So you and I can personally reason out a sufficiently good explanation with a little bit of knowledge on our side.  The most important thing to take from physics is the amount of potential energy stored in a building of that size. So claims of steel beams shooting out of the sides is not unrealistic. Your claim is that explosions shoot them out, so it's just a difference of opinion where the energy came from to propel these beams and not the fact that they shot across to other buildings. correct?  Well, potential energy adds up very quickly and can be as powerful as any explosive. That is physics.  &gt; How do you think WTC 7 Fell?  Thats a good question. I could better agree with you here, but that wasn't the initial statement you made. That could have been helped to fall quite easily, but that doesn't make the entire event a conspiracy, they possibly saw an opportunity and took it. The building might have been saved, but a purposefully set fire might have helped it along. Again though, that doesn't mean an entire conspiracy.
I would have gone with &lt;snugglz&gt; personally. He looks like he is very comfortable right there.
Fear and loathing ... two things many Republicans are best at.
Good point.  I'll try to stop.
How many devices do you own that you don't really need?
So he IS a Muslim!  FOX NEWS WAS RIGHT
Uh... clearly he is.
But it is a joke.
Blues?  Dues?  Snooze? C'mon, now, I really want to know what you think.  If you want your claim to be seriously considered, ditch the smoke and mirrors.
Who said anything about denying "all conspiracies" -- or even this one?
Let me start by saying that global warming is a serious problem that should be addressed on the personal, local, and global levels. However, this is nothing other than vote-buying using a feel-good policy that picks on a (relatively) small minority of people who drive SUVs.  Why am i saying that? Because no politician in their right mind would even think about taxing meat-eaters, due to the fact that they form a very large percentage of the population, so taxing them would be political suicide. Now, why do i mention meat-eaters? Because there have been numerous studies (including some by the UN) saying that as much greenhouse gases are emitted by livestock as emitted in transportation (in fact, some studies show that agriculture as a whole causes more greenhouse emissions, and the lion's share of agricultural emissions come from livestock). Factor in the indirect costs of livestock-raising (like cutting down rainforests to provide farmland for animal-feed, which ends up raising emissions because trees use co2 as their fuel of course), in addition to all the land and water used to raise animals, not to mention the sheer inefficiency of raising one kg of meat as opposed to one kg of non-meat-based products, and it becomes obvious that real environmentalists should considerably cut down on animal products (or go vegan all together).  But, as we've learned from Al Gore's emissions-hypocrisy (jet-flying, 3 houses that release 20 times more emissions than the average american, and he's not a vegetarian/vegan), the mantra of most environmentalists seems to be: Do as i say, not as i do.   So, like the anti-smoking laws, this is just picking on a minority demographic who aren't very vocal (and they shouldn't be: SUVs are an emissions nightmare), and making 'enviromentalists' happy that something is being done to curb emissions. But, it's alot easier to pick on someone else than confront your own problems and hypocrisy. For the sake of full disclosure, i'm a vegetarian (semi-vegan: so less than 2% of my caloric intake comes from animal products), and my biggest reasons are the ecological/environmental one (and also to offset the fact that i work in the oil and gas field) And folks, donwvote me all you want, but please do it for lack of content, or factual inaccuracies, not because i hold a minority opinion. 
Hehe...  Oh Yeah, I'm rolling in the digital love now.
What a nosy, ignorant cunt you are. How exactly does being downmodded make me a troll? Unpopular opinions are not wrong, in fact some of the best opinions are unpopular.  What you mean by "contributing to the discussion" is trying to make internet friends by agreeing with idiots. You can keep your idiot faux friends, I'd rather try to propagate ideas that are true and important.
88% of republicans are going to die in the next 10 years
If you read the article, you'll see that she was pregnant with the second child when it happened.
I love how his answer is to repeat the same old  official propaganda.  It would have been better if he would have put on some of those swirly eye trance glasses, turned to the crowd and said those lines.
I've never quite grasped why adults take seriously a man in dress and a pointy hat, who carries a gold stick.
And unlike McCain, preferred Men over Women
I, for one, would *love* some appreciation.   On my face.
Katyusha rockets cannot be aimed at a specific target, only a general area. Israel killed about a thousand civilians, though possessing much more precise munitions. Forty-three Israeli civilians died, one for every twenty-three Lebanese. I can't convince myself that Israel was an innocent victim in that war.
desi -&gt; local or indiginous as in eachother / ourselves  maa -&gt; mother  beti -&gt; daughter  bahu -&gt; daughter in law  [disclaimer - AFAIK]
Boom!
When will you Ron Paul people realize: A) You are on the political left? B) You want change, and should vote for Obama? He provides the most change available at this time. 
Um....no.  Let's look at the issues:  Ron Paul on the war:  GTFO, no more dead troops, babies, etc.  Hillary and Obama on the war:  Maybe we'll start withdrawal, but not until after 2013. And that's if I feel like it.  Ron Paul on the economy:  Fix that shit.  Hillbama on the economy:  Tax the shit out of you, crush the economy, collapse society as we know it. Then give the money to the mexillegals.  Yep, and that's about all you need to know.
never miss the politics subreddit or some users will throw fits.  Also, some of the best times to submit are parallel to the east coast of America work day for offices (9-6PM EST)...  also - good content trumps all, if it isn't a repeat.
What's the problem? Are you upset because you weren't aware or because you don't think it's a two-way race?
I did, but it rather read like a "How to deal with car-driving nutjobs." I personally interpreted it as "How to behave in traffic generally." If it really was just "Apologize if you fucked up," then: Well, duh.  Also, if it's the latter, the title is really, really wrong :)
JUST CAUSE I WAS TURNED ON DON'T MEAN I'M NO HOMOSEXER
"Looks like we got ourselves a reader here !"
That's some mighty fine police work, there Lou.
The backlash, both Arc's and RoR's case, has a lot to do with hype. Most tech people don't buy Sun or Microsoft PR anymore, but they did - until recently - expect blogs to be more open, knowledgable and down to earth.   Now that it becomes obvious bloggers about as prone to spreading/believing hype as your average journalist/non-tech manager, people are disappointed.
settle down, he's not going to win.  he'll be the nominee, but he's not going to win.
Nice idea. But this - if he keeps this up - will ensure he will never be president. we thought "swift-boating" was nasty.   Just wait folks.  And you know - I hate to be this cynical. Talking to the "folks" is clearly a way to go.  But...you gotta get elected first. This is the sure way to fail in November.
Pfft...we were doing good enough doing that to ourselves.  Anyone with half a brain knew that in 2000 we were headed for eventual bankruptcy. In reality, he just wants the credit for it.
Thank you. I tried to do a Web search, but only got foreign sites.
I'd just like to add that "listening" and "agreeing to every single demand" are not the same thing.
&gt; I'd rather Obama stick to his principles and tell the truth and let the democratic process take shape  The problem I have with that is that everyone else is already playing the system. When the elite game the system, you have to play along, or you lose. See: Kucinich; in spite of coming on top in every blind Democratic opinion poll, he never rose about 5% support. If you can't play the game, you can't win.   You can't expect to win poker honestly when everyone else is hiding aces. People are selfish; people are greedy. That's how it is. Support the guy who can play along, but who is also closest to your views.
I guess some Paul supporters finally switched sides. 
&gt; is somebody else justified taking the law in their own hands and extracting the justice they want?  Or lobbying governments until they change the law?
strays.
Some time ago there was a popular post in the main reddit: "Math subreddit please!" http://reddit.com/r/programming/info/642hz/comments/  Now we have the subreddit, we only have to start using it to make it worth visiting.
Atheism has nothing to do with science, reason, or faith. Saying someone is an atheist tells you nothing about *why* they're an atheist. All it tells you is that they do not have a belief in God.  Atheism also has fuck all do to with this article, so I encourage anyone who wants to discuss it to take it elsewhere.
Brownies anyone?
wired redesign can do very nice design.
This fucking sucks (no pun)
Whoops, missed that point.  Thanks. The good news is that she doesn't have custody either.  With the right kind of foster/adoptive care, the child may come out mentally unscathed.  But probably not.
&gt;I'm quite aware how many filthy Democrats  Thanks, I'm a Democrat and I appreciate the love :p
We absolutely should. And any dem elected will change that tone.
It used to be called propaganda. Edward Bernaise renamed it "public relations", because "propaganda" was what the Nazis did.
Here's where you're off: they didn't say "when they examine water", they said "Therefore we can predict that every future examination *of this molecule* will reveal the same chemical composition." It's a classic logic error that they're targeting; the assumption that due to something always previously being true, it will hold true in the future, which isn't logical on its own.  This guy says it pretty well later in the thread: http://reddit.com/r/science/info/67727/comments/c031oqd
How is this a dirty trick? What's wrong with being #1 most liberal?
I don't disagree with you. I went to a Catholic school for a few years, and the shit I saw made me think hard about the indoctrination I was getting. *Note: I stopped going to Catholic schools when I was in 4th grade.*  I could tell some stories!  Just used the Catholics as an example that most Americans could understand.  I don't think Scientologists are any more nutty than the rest of the hard-core religious folk. They're all getting milked just the same.
Fuck these racists.
finland rocks.
As a generality, you are correct.  But keep these three points in mind:  1)  Premeditation can happen in a split second.  There is no time requirement.  If the guy said to himself "I'm gonna shoot whoever enters that door" that is premeditation.  2)  That he shot the officer as he entered the premises, the prosecution might argue that he was "laying in wait", which would automatically be premeditation.  3)  It is quite possible that State has a statute that defines any slaying of an officer in active duty as first degree.
*Everything* stinks in *Everywhere*, Ohio.  I hate that place!
No.
Sure he gets points for admitting it, but just how much leniency will he extend to people today who are just like he was? My money is on him keeping the federal mandatory minimum bullshit going, which would speak to the strength (or lack thereof) of his character.
If it's a laptop, do some research on compatibility with Linux before buying it. As an OS I genuinely think it's "there" for the average user, BUT compatibility problems (I do need it to be able to sleep, and the screen drivers were crap) ended up driving me back to XP. The next laptop I buy, I'll do my research, and permanently make the switch.
Very dim here. Don't see the unintended pun.
Are you implying that the U.S. gave Israel nuclear weapons?  If that is the case then you are very much mistaken.  You should be looking at France if anyone at all.
Norway has a very strict immigration policy and xenophobia is very common due to their more or less homogeneous society.
I got 68% because ducks don't bark and Paris is not in New Zealand, and the woman killed the man, and water will be water. Didn't know valid and true were different cases. 
From the article:  "Only a small percentage of Republicans now say that dealing with global warming should be a top priority for the president and Congress"  Is not the same as whether or not it's a concern.  The blog is partly to blame as well. It also has a misleading headline.
The spoon I just picked up happens to be deadly, too; suppose I inserted it between your 4th and 5th vertebrae.  What's in a name?
We call "Mother" "the greatest calling."  We are one another's servants.  We are both servants of the children and servants of one another.  It is a division of responsibility, not a privilege for the father and slavery for the mother.  My wife grew up Catholic.  Her father abandoned her and her mother.  I've asked here several times whether or not she missed her father.  Tell me if you've ever heard this: "you can't miss what you never knew"... that was her reply.  Her mother was at her favorite bar... and anywhere else she could go... far more than she was home.  My half-sisters, I now know, grew up under similar circumstances.  In contrast, my adoptive, Mormon mother, though she worked in my adoptive, Mormon father's carpet cleaning business *from home* was always there, leading, guiding, disciplining, teaching....  Yeah, i still got away with and survived lighting things on fire and playing spin the bottle and breaking several bones crashing my bmx or my skateboard and crashing my Dad's mini-bike and dang near blowing my fingers off with firecrackers and meetin a bully's challenge to a fight and trying out smoking and myriad other stupid things along the way.  I. flat. out. fear. for other kids who ever did or do now or ever will wear a key around their necks.  Sadly my first marriage didn't last, but the mother's of my children both stay home full-time and it is my *responsibility* not only to get my butt out there and financially support the operation but also come home and take care of my bride and my children.   People who don't see the beauty in this traditional division of responsibility are misogynists or victims of self-hatred or soft-slavers... the CIA did provide initial funding for Ms. Mag so that they could get women out of the home and into the workforce, and wages and salaries have decreased and profits increased.  period.
I don't edit for free. I type the way I think. Like I'm having a conversation. I also don't edit because of grammar spelling nazi's, they try to discredit ideas over simple mistakes. sotopissthemoffimakeasmanymistakesaspossible.
Moron. Your bus is leaving.
I think most of the blame would fall on the people who capitalized off of it. Larry Silverstein, the entire Military Industrial Complex, and the rest of the Goombas with the fat pockets.  Don't forget about the NWO think tank groups who were saying things to the effect of "America needs a new Pearl Harbor."
that's why I got the first 3 wrong, and the rest right.
Fox's effect on "the debate" exists regardless of anything podRZA does. podRZA isn't adopting Fox's POV, he's merely pointing out that millions of viewers **do** adopt Fox's point of view. Those viewers are the ones who let Fox affect the debate.
Shazam! My Sarcast-o-meter went off, but I thought it was a false alarm.
It's like trying to quote a famous song, but getting the last part of the line wrong
What about honkies and wiggers?  I mean, let's not forget our white brothers!
Or, Reddit should prioritize results which contain both my search terms to those which only contain one of them...
I don't see any problem here. He was tortured in a prison camp for fuck-sake. He is allowed to call his captors "gooks"! Can we not even afford him that simple bit of dignity?   This is like a person detained at Gitmo calling his American captors "yank". What the fuck is wrong with you people?
That's what I was thinking. The city works together with... itself?
I won't deny it's expensive, all right; strong sterling doesn't help the comparisons. I still think it's more affordable than even a small car (you would have parking to think about even if you didn't have the congestion charge.) Ultimately cars do have a cost associated with them.
One thing to keep in mind:  That the guy was not found with a huge stash of drugs makes the case a lot more sympathetic, but has absolutely no relevency regarding his guilt or innocence regarding the slain police officer.   A criminal still has the right to use force to protect himself, and an innocent man gains no extra ability to attack a police officer serving a legally obtained warrant.
That just is word play. It says it goes from a punishable crime to a regulated legal substance. Decriminalization by that definition means that no crime has been committed. That makes it legal under specific circumstances.   He doesn't want to make it legal at all, he wants to reduce sentences for offenders. It's pretty obvious what Edwards said in the linked video and the reasons people want it to remain illegal. You're simply deluding yourself if you think that decriminalization will result in an end to the drug war and the police state that surrounds it. People will likely still be imprisoned for treating it as a free market commodity (which is what you presumably want).
What?  Voting stoned ain't cool no more?
In short because they are a money grubbing cult who only wants to help themselves to your bank account and giving things away for free does not foster that goal.
Considering his stance on medical marijuana and his checkered stance on decriminalizing pot, it's a bit better than McCain and Romney who are very clear about zero tolerance on all of these things. But that doesn't excuse Obama, Obama has yet to show consistency, but I like his direction. Hillary is also for stopping medical marijuana raids. Dems are a step in the right direction, Ron would of course be the best choice on this issue.
There are easier ways to make something motionless than to use three gears.
Really? I do.   You see, I'm not a qualified demolitions expert or civil engineer. My fields of expertise are not related to such and therefore I listen to experts. Experts like demolitions companies (who all say without exception that there was no controlled demolition) or the American Society of Civil Engineers, or a number of major Universities with engineering departments, or Firefighters Associations. You know, people who understand and have valid opinions and who know what they are looking at.   But perhaps you'd like to weigh in with your expertise.
That's exactly what I was thinking, too.
That's not a hair question.
Actually the correct tense is "shut up".
Shouldn't it be in the sports subreddit?  Also:  What a fucking cock Berman is. I hate working film sets and TV sets for just that reason.  His ass would be barking and I would slip and tell him to go fuck himself - then get fired and never work in TV again.  Nothing worse than being on a set and working with a star that acts like that.
I **agree** with your statement.  I have made bold what I see as a particularly interesting clause within the conclusion. 
&gt; If you get paid in bonds, that is income, at least according to the IRS.  Come on, admit it -- you're just skimming, and not really reading, what I have to say.  &gt; I say if you store liquid capital, that is wealth. You say no, and immedidately contradict yourself by including liquid capital in your definition of wealth.  Look -- more evidence you're just skimming!  I never said liquid capital wasn't wealth.  Never.  Ever.  Not once.  I may have said liquid capital isn't *synonymous with wealth*, but I didn't say it isn't (a form of) wealth.  &gt; the poor spend a larger percentage of their income than the rich  That seems to be the tendency.  If you think I'm asserting B or C, that's just more evidence that you're only skimming.  &gt; The evidence is you don't understand that a consumption tax is regressive.  Okay, let's examine this argument's form:  1. You say a given class of taxes favors the rich (we'll ignore for now the fact you keep substituting words with subtly different meanings for each other).  2. I dispute the notion that this class of taxes necessarily favors the rich.  3. You use this as evidence that I don't know anything about this class of taxes (or, at least, a particular subclass of taxes), despite the fact you haven't effectively supported the original assertion.  A similar employment of that tactic would involve me saying the sky is green and, when you dispute me and say it's blue, using our differing opinions as proof that you don't know anything about the sky.  &gt; Talk about the pot calling the kettle black.  "I know you are, but what am I?" is not a logically valid argument form.
Obama is the next bubble. 
As a non-car, non-bike driver I can see plenty violations on both sides. But the cyclists are the only ones that almost hit _me_ every few days.
Try prefixing the language to your query - that usually works for me. Tends to pick up dictionary sites and the like.  hindi beti for example.
When I was nine, I hated sleepovers - I got homesick.  2 months of that?!  I'd be emotionally stunted.
Yay, sanity!
Is he trying to say that, like a kitchen door, he swings both ways?
#did we miss the blowjob?
No way I'm looking inside that thing. I already seen a pic of Bush and McCain hugging and my stomach is going out of it's mind. 
No, but I used to regularly reverse up a snow-covered driveway in a front-wheel-drive car, and having 4WD would only have helped me in a small number of circumstances.
Stupid Israel.
i remember that BS. I don't think i learn about a single news event on there. alls i remember is stupid kids talking about things they have no clue about and commercials. It is such a joke. The schools dont even use the tv's anyway because they suck they just buy there own sets to show other things.
i dont even know if youre serious or not, but i'll try to clarify something that you are missing. you're way off the ball ms warriors can deliver damage if you play them correctly. &gt;How often do you need 2 tanks in a 5 man? &gt;So we don't need OTs in 5 mans... and even if we did, that's what hunter/lock pets, shaman, rogues, and druids are for. You're asking how often... It depends on how those groups are. If there are stupid players, they choose to attack before the maintank can build threat/hate on the creeps. Tanks should be taking all the damage and also initiating attacks, but it doesn't happen necessarily when they might be disabled (Mara hello?). Healing also causes threat which pulls aggro off the tank. any experienced player knows this by level 20. if you don't, i suggest reading a guide before wiping out your party members a few more times. Not all warriors entering a group asks who is tanking dur dur dur like they're dumb. It's a protection warrior that tanks because of their devestate ability and shield wall. Their revenge is improved and causes a lot of threat. you overlook the possibility that other players, like a priest, may heal so much that it causes a creep to jump out on them. this is when an offtank can help and keep order. instead of having the priest run around like a headless chicken, the offtank can simply help the main by bringing the stray creep back into the area he's tanking. but lets say a regular tank does this, what happens? the tank has a limited range, he's melee. if he leaves the creeps area of attack, they redirect their aim on the rogues/hunters/etc.. pretty much everyone else while you're pulling that one creep off the healer or mage. i suggest you learn how to play. sounds like you know jackshit.
Theres nothing wrong with SUVs.Theres so many bad drivers on the road that I'd rather be in an SUV, than a shitty prius when you get in an accident. Not to mention Quality of vehicle. If you spend alot of time in your vehicle, you should get something you like.
&gt;It is simply more profitable to keep it secret, charge an assload, and have famous faces draw the lines for you..  Very true. These people play on the unstable, those with addictive personalities/mentally unstable.  And pitch it as the cure all solution, mock psych as quackery/brutal in order for those dependent on drugs to be dependent on them
yeah.  i thought more people would get it.
[CB](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Citizens'_band_radio)
That article is too long to read for an attention deficit webphile. But - yes. 
Well no shit. Huckabee fell off the wagon after Iowa, and 9iu11ani is gone.
You know, I've smoked my fair share.  I wasn't getting on "weed", just pointing out the fact that there's a lot of shit that "regular" people ingest that's a lot more harmful, and they don't even realize it. We won't even get into the shit that's in simple tap water.  Hell, if anything, I think the world needs to pack a few more bowls and chill the fuck out. ...perhaps yourself included.  Uptight I am not.  And just to clarify, I smoke cigarettes -menthol no less. I know that I'm putting trash into my body. point is, we all are, simply by breathing "fresh air", putting cancer into ourselves.  The best drug I ever beat was trying to carry the weight of the world on my shoulders. To each their own.
I'm about to leave the office so this will most likely be my last post regarding this; here goes.  This sentence: &gt;said "happens in the 3rd world all the time". intellectual replied "It happens in the 1st world all the time, too."  does NOT mean that an equal number happen in both sets.  Only that  both have a high number of people being forced into sexual servitude.  No, I'm not lacking a sense of scale.  It doesn't matter what the population is.  50,000 new people per year is quite a number of people.  If 50K people gathered at a rally, it would be a huge crowd of people regardless of what the population of the city , state or nation the rally was held in.   Who said that the editor was unaware,the article certainly didn't. The question mark was merely a device to say YES it does happen frequently in ( oh gasp) America which was the entire point of the article. To show that's it's a serious problem, HERE where you would love to think it isn't.   &gt;knowledge of rich kids on spring break in Cancun != title chosen by editor of mainstream US publication  Never said it was equal, it was an analogy.  Just because someone is unaware of something does not mean that it doesn't exist. At any rate have a pleasant evening.
Yeah let's only pay attention to what people like O'Reilly or Chris Matthews have to say.  They're the *real* experts.
Um, the Church was the main supporter of science and critical thinking for most of European History. Do you think any of this would have been possible without Gregor Mendel?
no. I see 'a bear on a bridge.'
&gt; Have those hostages that Hezbollah took ever been seen or heard from again?  Kidnapping a couple of soldiers really sucks.  Killing or crippling 300 civilians sucks 150 times more.  &gt; Israel probably cant remember exactly where everything is located war is a stressful time you know.  Yeah, they're reckless wankers, just like Hezbollah.
We have seen these a few times over Los Angeles in the past few years, too. Beautiful but creepy.
That's an awful title. &gt;:|
Because, you know, "education", "pensions", and "health care" are such important constitutional roles of the government. National defense SHOULD be the biggest expense for the federal government . . . that's what the federal government is for!
Well damn, if Susan Sa*ran*don thinks that way, maybe I *will* vote for Obama after all.
You're now nothing more than a repetitive bore.  Once more, fool?
Well John McCain and Mitt Romney stressed the importance of winning at last nights debate.  I'm not sure what Ron Paul or Huckabee thought, because they didn't get to talk.
&gt;I'd rather try to propagate ideas that are true and important.  Like equating Israelis with Jews around the world and blaming them for everything? Or by distorting what people say?  Now seriously, how old are you? If you are not an adult I give you my apology (it's normal for kids to have binary simplistic points of views) and almost my congratulations for trolling me that much. You will probably grow up wiser. But if you are over 25 then your case is a lost cause.
&gt; Well, not me. I don't want to be a sheeple without a life.  That's an enviable attitude!  It would be good if a lot more Americans had this perspective.  However, I think you might underestimate the amount of creativity and personal responsibility that the "enlightened" software companies have.  Consider Google: 20% of your time, a full day every week, can be spent on your own self-directed projects.  Can you really earn a $95K/yr salary doing consulting work 4 days per week 8-9 hours per day?  (That's about the amount I observe most people working)  Can you earn that kind of salary and have a day left over to implement your personal ideas? While you're executing the implementation, do you have the power to say "I don't like this design.  Let's scrap it.  I think the product would be better if it did `X`" ?  Don't get me wrong -- I have not been in the software industry nearly as long as you probably have, at 41 years of age, but what I have seen makes me optimistic.  Even if the work you do at a corporation is very specified, how long does it take to work your way up?  If you spend a number of years at a company, you could be a dev. lead, manager, sr. manager or higher.  At that point I think you're pretty much setting the direction of your team or department based on your vision.  Not only are you implementing the projects the way you would like, you are creating the projects entirely from scratch based on your ideas and ambitions! I find it hard to believe you could find that in consulting work.  It sounds to me like you might be happiest owning your *own* software company :-)  But I guess it all comes down to ... what are your ambitions?  Do you enjoy coding, or is that just your profession?  Another way to ask the question:  If you won $100 million in the lottery or something, would you keep coding?  What would you write?  I would stay right where I am.  For a while anyway ;)
Alarmist headline. Men have dicks and women have an urge to suck 'em. Have no fear. 
Amtrak would probably be profitable if it were not legally required to maintain long-distance, low traffic routes across large sparsely populated western states.  Almost all transportation in America is heavily subsidised (by which I mean the roads and the airlines).
God damn the comment section of the article is a laugh riot.
Unfortunately, although people have published volumes, so many people don't know about it. I myself only just learned about Bernays a few weeks ago. But I think it's very important to know, these things. Not so that we can give up responsibility and blame corporations for everything that is "wrong," but so that we can be effective in changing the status quo. In short, thanks.
Ron Paul deserves more time in front of the camera.  When he speaks,  he speaks with a genuine desire to let the American people know that he cares, and that what would do as president of the U.S.A is a step in the right direction.  I wish we didn't have to watch Romney and McCain smirk and snicker like little school boys.  Those aren't characteristics of a good presidential candidate,  especially when the matter at hand is American lives.
Possibly, but your Dad wasn't available.
If tommy chong were running for prez i'd smoke one before voting...probably with him too
I believe that's called impeading the flow of traffic and it is illegal.
You're talking about any large company. You think Google's not like that? Sony? Believe me, they are.
Why bother to debate with a man who has never been wrong his whole life?
HAHAHAHAHAHAHAHA... I'm gay, but I'm no republican. 
I would like to subscribe to this "history" of which you speak. Is it delivered fortnightly?
Start-&gt; Connect To if you can't figure it out from there, then you should just give up.
It's not about change for change sake, and to be perfectly honest the only changes Obama represents is skin tone and the ability for a president to clearly articulate. Obama, policy-wise, is not substantially different than Clinton, McCain, or Romney.  I don't mean to downplay the fact that he is black. I think electing a black president (and having him successfully complete his term) would do wonders to move our country in the right direction in terms of our cultural evolution; but by no means does Obama favor change that will undo the damage done by a government that is no longer beholden to protecting the liberty of individuals.
I think I'll go for a walk!
Me.
I understand what you're saying and, yes, there are a lot of bad actors out there. Many are there just because they are pretty, and not because of any talent.  But there are many skills in this area. Playing oneself is not, necessarily, easy. Sometimes it is actually easier to impersonate a type than it is to portray you're own correct emotional responses to situations.  Real acting demands serious self study. And there is much to be admired in those who are able to play "themselves" accurately.
I'll bet it was his hair that was making the calls.
Maybe not to end it, but not to start another one.
At this point, though, who isn't profiting off my tax dollar?
Nowhere does it say that Montel was taken off the air because of this clip. It's nothing but pure speculation. 
Wait, I thought your original comment was about driving through snow. I don't expect SUV's and trucks to go away. They obviously have their purposes, but they are stupid for the majority of city driving IMO and most do not have any advantage in snow.
Reddit obsession with Obama is bordering on the hysterical. Make any skeptical comment and you will be down-modded.   Redditors(some of them) are "in love". They have lost their reason and ability to make measured judgments.  Are most of them so gullible/ so desperate for a savior as to fall headlong in bed with ANY candidate that is the appeal du jour?  I especially love the morphing support from Paul to Obama. As if the transition were that easy. One demi-god replaces another. And in truth both are very interesting people. Very different. And flawed.  Is nuance a lost art of discrimination?
Indeed.
your processor being hot has nothing to do with vista.  that is a poorly cooled or too-far-overclocked cpu.  try cleaning the dust out of it, or adding a fan to your case.  also, your heatsink may not be seated properly
Two-terms for Ron Paul followed by two for Barry Obama.
Beautiful code &lt;3
Soylent Green anyone? Anyone?
um.  no.  they benchmark different system with different services running on different hardware and call it official and scientific.
And bikers don't give me dirty looks when I honk at you when your riding 3 wide going 20mph under the speed limit on a 2 lane road separated by a double yellow.  Every fucking weekend!
Created by government? On the contrary, they were *allowed* by government.
I can't believe anyone would fall for that! I mean, it really isn't butter.
Tell you what...you give me your personal email...I'll send you my personal address..or you can give me yours.  Let's meet, if we can and talk about you smashing my face.  You probably could.  I'm not a very big guy and I don't know how to fight, but I'd still be willing to meet with you.  Do we have a deal?
Me. :-(
Ok, can anyone tell me what is wrong with what he said? &gt;Scientific investigation should be accompanied by "research into anthropology, philosophy and theology" to give insight into "man's own mystery, because no science can say who man is, where he comes from or where he is going", the Pope said. &gt;"Man is not the fruit of chance or a bundle of convergences, determinisms or physical and chemical reactions," he told a meeting of academics of different disciplines sponsored by the Paris Academy of Sciences and Pontifical Academy of Sciences.   All he seems to be saying to to shy away from scientific determinism and encourage looking at the totality of humanity. I think the new Pope is a jerk, but you all might want to read before running your mouths off.
He's right, pro-war vs. anti-war.
Jesus. Only on reddit would this be considered news.
Don't ask for a job - just ask what you could do to help. :) The job offers will start coming after you've helped them *do* something.
That's how real candidates roll, Paultards. They didn't even plan a fundraising publicity stunt.
I'd say it sums it up about right.
Yeah, whatever.
Look harder. Did you kill anyone? No? Good. Yes? Go fuck yourself.  "Its a good technique if you are a mature soul."  So killing someone then contemplating the killing is a sign of a mature soul?  So in order to see if killing civilians is wrong, I have to put myself in a killer's shoes, kill civilians, and THEN contemplate my actions? THAT's the thinking and actions of a mature soul? If soldiers hate war, WHY ARE THEY FIGHTING IT (--the US has started all its wars since after, and most before, WW2)? Aren't they being intellectually dishonest? Or maybe they're pussies who can't stand up for what they know to be correct?  I don't know. Maybe gobbels is a great person. Maybe gobbels hates war. I'm sure he knows how much war sucks.
I for one am sick of the notion that 3rd party candidates "spoil" "ruin" (any other negative adjective) for in this example Al Gore if the guy was so damn electable then why didn't he gain a clear victory?   The idea that a 3rd party candidate could ever ruin an election is downright un-american.
set your sights on the sites that excite
Motorolla has been making garbage for years. I think the best phone they ever made was the star-tac, and that was in the cell-phone infancy days.  I'm surprised they didn't jump ship sooner, or form an alliance a-la sony/ericcson  Nokia/samsung/lg own the market in phones  with blackberry/htc/danger for smartphones  apple to be determined
If this pun isn't already made, my bad...here it goes...  Now this is is a fox that I can watch. You guys get it? Hehe...i hate my self.
Downmodded for the same reason. You're weird!
Yes, but Obama is so much less polarizing.  When it comes to needing a majority to get things done, Obama will have a much easier time getting Republicans to go along with him.  So while they may share similar views, one of them will have a much easier time getting it done.
I don't know - how exactly did we get around that? What an amazing strawman.
Why think when mexicodoug will answer all your questions?
Even if I am one, I like the term Paultard.
That's awesome.
You mean a class act? I have a crush on Anderson Cooper.
http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Vtv2OJcRZws
Do you notice a trend?  You use Reddit,  I would assume you come here to get away from the normal crazy fucked up world for a few minutes a day.  Isn't it entirely possible that people here see things in a logical way..  You don't just drop support for a candidate out of nowhere.  As long as Ron Paul continues to make sense, and continues to look like the most straighforward candidate..  people will support him.   If you don't like it,  Filter your prefs or don't use the site.   And if you don't do either of those..  then quit bitching about those who support them.  You are in a politics subreddit post.  Why is this a surprise?  
The banned commercials are always the best ones.
Article 12 of The Constitution required that the electoral delegates from Texas were to have been disallowed for the election of 2000 and 2004 because both Bush and Cheney were living in Texas, paying taxes there, using driving licenses from there, engaged in their occupations there.  When the Texas contingent voted for Bush and Cheney they violated The Constitution.
Actually, Dianetics is in my local library. It's in psych/new age stuff instead of religion, though. That section is right next to religion, where a number of other religious books, including several Bible translations, a Book of Mormon and a handful of other heavy tomes.   Only Dianteics, nothing on Xenu.
Wow, thank you for posting this. He actually got more time here than he did during the entire debate.
You know what happens when you assume right?
Nah, there's at least two of us!
That's just one of many reasons I have a French fiancee... :)
On behalf of the rest of us, please keep in mind that libertarian zealots on reddit do not resemble America as a whole.  Here, the guy would be given a medal of valor.  In the real America, he will probably be given a life sentence.
St. Valentine's Day falls on February 14th each and every year. did you buy a nice card ? No? Have a look here then!
Please please please let it be either:  Google  T-mobile   not even sure if t-mob was in the bidding, but since they're a worldwide player in the cell-market they have more revenue than at&amp;t.   If google got it i wonder how quickly they'll be rolling out the googlephone with android built-in. I won't buy another smartphone til this pans out. Crosses fingers.
Yea, up here in Hamburg it works _perfectly_. &lt;/sarcasm&gt;   I sometimes see cyclists here crossing from the sideway, over the bike-lande, over the street and on to the other side, all without a care in the world. But all hell breaks loose if you step on the bike-lane once as a pedestrian.
Bill O'Reilly has denied the existence and significance of America's 200,00+ homeless veterans. So Brave New Films sent some vets to the FOX News building in NY to deliver a 17,000-strong petition asking BOR to apologize. Then some stuff happened...
What a poorly written article.
That, and sparse checkouts... I can finally recommend it without hesitation!
Anyone who actually needs it.
Reddit approves.
[Use the automated Romney dialer to prank call your friends](http://reddit.com/r/politics/info/661c1/comments). All of them.  I recommend the "nuclear terrorism" message or the "islamic jihadism" as the funniest.
And again in 2004. Perhaps he'll enter this year again since the political parties have conspired to rig the elections again.
The other 88% are concerned with jesus/gas prices/supporting the troops/not getting caught being gay/the "illegals" that mow their lawn/bad video games/their daughter being a whore/son being gay/owning a gun/having better technology then their neighbor/the winner of (insert favorite reality show here)/gimme a Whopper....  Or something like that.
&gt; Most mainstream economists do not consider it their place to make value judgments, so this they share with the Austrians. However, that doesn't make Austrian theory any less politically heinous.  If the pursuit of knowledge arrives at conclusions that do not agree with what you wish to be true, you declare it evil.  Good to know.  Your entire argument against Austrian economics seems to be predicated upon the notion that you dislike the implications of its insights.  &gt; There's no need to make value judgments explicitly when you know what people's value judgments will be.  This probably seems like a reasonable statement when you think you know what all value judgments should be.  It also proves my point about the Austrian school being oriented toward apolitical inquiry into catallactics.  &gt; For example, by analogy to engineering, if I said to you, "If you don't reinforce those girders, there's a good chance the bridge will collapse in an earthquake," that's a completely descriptive statement. I don't need to make any normative judgments for you to infer the "correct" normative position.  This doesn't tell me anything about the goals of the bridge-building project.  Are we designing something that will collapse into a ravine in an earthquake so that we can make some observations about that for purposes of advancing the state of the art of metallurgy?  You've just assumed that all bridges are, and must be, intended to survive earthquakes -- which is probably *usually* the case, but may not *always* be the case.  The Austrian school of economics evaluates whether the bridge will fall under various circumstances, not whether that's a good or bad thing.  Period.  That's pretty much the point of the Austrian school of economics.  &gt; If Austrian economics is incorrect in the consequences that it predicts, then as a tool by which others implement their value judgments — and economics is certainly such a tool — it will lead them wrong.  True, in such a case.  And?  That in no way indicts the value of Austrian economics.
An intern told me that ever since McCain got into the whole amnesty thing, he's stopped with blow jobs and now only performs the Dirty Sanchez.
I want Ron Paul , followed by Rand Paul, followed by Rand Paul's son.... THE PAUL DYNASTY.
SUCCESS!
Thomas Jefferson
$50?  Is that in January dollars or February dollars?
Best Web Solution provider offering services at affordable rates. Services includes webdesigns, web hosting, consultation and training.
Or, "they leave without going", for maximum mindboggle.
No, it's Paultard spam. Enjoy your extra downmods, fuckface.
whom
Here is one factor that environmentalists hate to talk about: http://www.nasa.gov/centers/goddard/news/topstory/2003/0313irradiance.html The elliptical orbit of the Earth has to do with the varying distance between the Earth and Sun. Its effect is the same as walking towards or away from a campfire and the difference in heat that would be noticed. The Earth also wobbles on its axis, which affects the polar ice caps. Also, the strength of the magnetosphere varies, which in turn varies the effect of the solar wind on the upper atmosphere. This is still being studied, and its full effect still unknown. How many more examples would you like?
This is big news. Why in the world would anybody acting in the interest of the economy endorse someone who wants to expand the budget by $287,000,000,000 annually?  http://www.ntu.org/main/press.php?PressID=991&amp;org_name=NTUF  Here is your answer: Volker does not care if the middle class gets entirely wiped out by an Obama administration through inflation and the subsequent credit contraction.
Fuck you:  http://www.sorryeverybody.com/
step 7: it puts the lotion in the basket
FORGET NADER.  VOTE WRONG PAUL 2032!
Description and link to an interactive newsmap which generates stories harvested from the google news aggregator.  Very unique way in which to get news.
Ron Paul = The Invisible Man
Why don't we start an open source project utilizing scripting language Whatever and just build the nation a sweet e-voting system.  There really isn't anything difficult about the whole endeavor... in fact, I can't really even imagine a simpler program to write.  Why does the code need to be compiled at all?  Its just counting clicks, after all.  Input = click, output = flat file or database and printer.
Guess the Gold Standard is impossible now?
I was hit by a truck, while stationary waiting to turn onto a road. The driver simply didn't see me. (Despite my flashing lights and reflector gear.) The driver didn't -want- to hit me, it's just the reality that people have accidents on the road all the time, swapping out a bike for a car is simply more dangerous. Many of my friends had far more serious accidents (mine was quite harmless, not even a bruise) - I had reasoned that my friends got hit by cars because they did things wrong. (Many cyclists go through red lights when there is no traffic for example. On principle I don't do these things as it gives cyclists a bad image.)  I've learned that as a cyclist you are always on the defensive - also it's a death trap to listen to music and cycle at the same time. You quite need all your senses, and the most abusive flashing lights will always serve you well. Being noticed is almost as important as knowing the location of every car around you.  Although IMHO the most inconsiderate drivers on the roads here in Australia appear to be taxis and busses. (People who are on the road constantly tend to feel possessive over it, thus disobeying the more simply traffic rules which are designed to help cyclists and prevent minor accidents.)  A good friend of mine that has been hit several times now by taxis opening doors or veering across many lanes to collect a fare has the rather novel approach of catching up with the taxi covertly (usually quite easy in the city) reaching into their car - turning off their engine, then proceeding to ride off with their car keys in hand. While I don't feel it's good for the image of the cyclists. It certainly is a very final way of dealing with what are dangerous drivers on the road.
Wasn't explaining the joke, just the grammar.
the thing is, that other than during the school run, those large people carrier things generally only contain the driver
Meh, it happens.
I'm sure 50 years ago these were racy and titillating.  Now, I'm just wondering if it was really that hard for women to keep their panties on.  The celery... the celery...
Israel is around 20% not jewish as well as having a huge number of people dissatisfied with the government. There are more Jews in new york than in Israel so why is it that when Olmert fucks up it's the jews fucking up but no one blamed the jews for Guillianis mistakes (apart from a few whackos.)
I thought it was because most women in India are ugly as fuck. No wonder they want the white women. Just like black guys here in the states.  Yes, I know that hot, Indian women exist, as do hot, black women. But I'm sure that they aren't putting out for these douchebags!
Sorry, no, you are completely wrong. First of all, only a fucking moron thinks bombs have flashing LED lights.  Secondly, there are LOTS of flashing LED lights, so getting hysterical over some particular ones is completely irrational.  Thirdly, these lights were arranged with patterns. . .if you were making a bomb why would you arrange the LED lights in patterns?  You wouldn't, so it's EVEN STUPIDER to think these were some kind of threat.  Finally, and most importantly, after it became obvious that the "public workers" had completely overreacted, wasted millions of dollars, and inconvenienced a lot of people, they refused to admit they had done anything wrong and SUED THE PEOPLE WHO PUT UP THE LIGHTS FOR THE COST OF THEIR OWN IDIOCY.  WTF?  You are defending these people?????
actually if you want to get technical I missed three commas, left out two words, one run on sentence, one incomplete sentence, three misspelled words, and a few puncutation marks in the wrong place. But like you said this is a casual site, I'm not writing my senior thesis.
This is what happens when you feed a stoner scrambled eggs! http://reddit.com/info/67ank/comments/
Does the pope shit in the woods?
upmod for Ender's Game reference.
Yes. It is. Try Tikkun for an alternative and more progressive Jewish opinion.   Commentary will find Obama speaking to muslims as people worthy of being heard anathema.  Get ready for the slurs and slander to begin. Mind you - what Obama REALLY thinks who knows?  Where he really stands on this complex issue is uncertain so I understand their concern. too much empty gesture, not enough substance.  Where Hillary stands is clear. I am not sure I like it it but I understand it.   It makes her "electable".  What she then does would be interesting.
And Vice President who?
Sorry, I forgot about that.  But you can still tell from the "photobucket.com" domain name.
That's not what I meant. I'm sorry if it was taken that way. Yes, there is a demand for the smut, BUT, I believe that the media helps to create it, hence fueling the fire. Let's take the Anna Nicole fiasco; she died, and her death was reported everywhere because people wanted to know what happened. Understandable. But then, the speculation started. Who is the father? Was it drugs? Was it the same as her son, Etc. The same thing with Heath Ledger,and other Celeb death and scandal. When all of this is constantly shown in peoples faces, it (understandably so) clouds out other, more important issues. Sorry if I came off holier than thou. 
For cyclists roundabouts can be a problem, because cars cut you up all the time. It's essentially the same problem as any other right turn (or left if you drive on the right) in that you start from the side of the road and have to cut across the traffic to get into lane. Then you need to hog the lane to stay safe.
Well, you have to consider the motivations behind the whole thing.  They're just preemptively attacking the Dem nominee.  Obama shouldn't even be the most liberal senator--that should go to someone like Feingold.
I see. I've just never heard them called that (or anything else that I can remember).
I agree. But I am sure Commentary does not.
Perhaps we can appease the Fox News fans by adding. "...and leave total nuclear annihilation on the table, after said talks, so we can all return to heaven"  Just a thought.
They've already found the nurse. As I remember it, she wasn't too happy about having some strange sailor come up and kiss her.
sadly, consumers enjoy features, and don't want to have to "code" their documents.
You're my little bitch.
Disinterest in spending retirement panhandling because libertarians have some theory?
No. Never.
If it were possible to maintain a country on very little taxes, wouldn't there already be countries doing this? I mean, if it makes you that much more successful, you'd think libertarianism would be busting out all over.  Is there an example of a nearly libertarian country? (Aside from Somalia, I mean.) Alternatively, is it possible for some libertarians to take over a country and put their money where their mouth is, so to speak?
Apparently the joke is that the gears would not actually turn. Pretty lame...
It is a absurd to say that 4WD isn't going to be useful in snow.  While this doesn't apply in London, you should drive up some snow covered mountains during the winter and tell me that 4WD or AWD doesn't help.  It can mean the difference between going skiing and not going skiing.
Which way do you think these gears will rotate?
Utah should have been polygamy porter...You can't have just 1...
I believe that Helvetica is optimized for printing and Arial is optimized for screen - i.e. Helvetica looks better printed but on screen Arial looks better.  This is a bit of a non story.
What is the reason for change then? For me it's because this country is so broken right now that I don't think we can survive another term of Republicans who have obvious personal agendas out weighing the needs of the nation. I trust Obama, not to do everything he tries to do, but to not lie to me to further his agenda. I can't say that about any other candidate. Also, in my opinion, you lose credibility when you say there is no policy difference between McCain, Obama, Romney, and Clinton. Get over the race issue, if you can't, you're probably racist. Obama 2008 
Then I guess I'd say I don't believe the 2 are directly correlated:)  Thanks for clarifying:)
Upmod so people will try to look up the word, "portend".
Did they *really* have to use *Flash* for that site? Seriously, come on people, use the right tool for the job. Flash is not the right tool to use for displaying a block of text.
It would also be much, much nicer if people wouldn't use their cars for every shit. If the gas prize climbs up to 2000% of what it's now, people might use their cars only when they really need them.  You don't want cyclists on your road, but the cyclists have to live with the pedestrians? And the pedestrians with the cyclists? If you're that much in a hurry, you should've driven off half an hour earlier.
We could plug in at various power outlets and get charged up.
I commented solely about your incorrect conflation of "legalize" with "decriminalize", which would irritate me regardless of my position on the issue.  I never stated my position on the issue.  You presume a lot to presume you know what I want based on those two comments.
I wouldn't be surprised if you were correct, but it's definitely a unjust violation of rights. Merely *deciding* to see a psychiatrist does not give them any right to imprison me, even if they think I'm lying later. It's not like I signed any forms. Nor did any professional determine that I was a threat. It's kinda scary if they can detain me just because my mom tells them to.  But again, no, they're not there to look out for me, they're just covering their own asses. It's a good thing I didn't really need help, because I wouldn't have gotten it there after being told I'd be detained indefinitely if I failed to convince a psychiatrist to let me free.
 (fact: - n 1)  is the same as   (fact (- n 1))  When : happens to be followed by a newline *and* an indented block of code, it also cancels the newlines.   a:   b   c  Is quite obviously   (a b c)  Now, in the cases that you have something that isn't a single symbol, e.g.   +:   * x x   * y y  It also puts parentheses around the expressions, that is, it treats them as   +:   (* x x)   (* y y)  Then cancels the newlines.   + (* x x) (* y y)  Anyway, the actual algorithm is simple -- it just sounds complicated in human terms / English.
They are screwed. And then who will we support and vice versa?
I will answer your question after you answer mine.
Damnit, the MSM is gonna cut Huckabee and Paul out of the next debates, and justify it by saying, "look, we're ignoring Huckabee, too!".
OK, so lets go back to #1.  Maybe instead of just making an arrogent and baseless comment, you can explain why he has a "shitbox" and why you are willing to bet that a Subaru is better.   You can easily put an ATV on a trailer but which is more convenient? Using a truck that is designed for such scenarios, or attaching a trailer to a car. Do you even know if he has a place to store a trailer?
SUCCESS!
*yawn*
Exactly.  Obama is most certainly not the most liberal Senator in the U.S. Senate.  Feingold certainly has him beat.  Also, what about the socialist from Vermont?
Sweet! MenTalguY is a very cool fellow.  I've known him for a couple years.  He's also a founding member of inkscape, likes to diddle with haskell, and the like.  Not so ruby centric as the prelude implies.
I'm against your religion of science.
I wonder how badly this cop &amp; his girlfriend are gonna get pimped out in prison. reversal of fortune is a bitch and it has their name written all over it.
You're being played like a piano.  Once more, with *feeling* this time, fool!
I don't think Buddhism can really be classified as a religion, if that's what you were implying.
Sovereign Wealth diversification?  NOOOO WAIII!
[It goes to the federal government, to use as they please](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Federal_Communications_Commission#Spectrum_auctions).  ie. It will probably help fund one hour of war.
I've heard the French make a killer ration kit.
America should show it's O-face
OK, that makes more sense now.  Also, it should be known, my original post way back at the beginning was a joke.
The illusion of shared benefit for actual shared cost (profits for them).
It was Apple. They want to expand their cell-phone market share.
You make an ass out of Ume, high lord of comment threads? 
No Castlevania? And another nod for Metal Gear.
Try staying on topic.
I thought you said you left Reddit.
Less men would look gay when they took a sip of their drink!
You're my little bitch.
If you've learned nothing from reading reddit over the last few months you should (I hope) realize that the majority of us American citizens are utterly disgusted with the administration that is running this country and are embarrassed by what the government does in our name.  I can only hope that enough citizens become active enough to oust the politicians that have started the Decline and Fall of the American Empire.  Maybe then, some of you may want to reconsider becoming an American.
weird..   i've never had to do anything to get it to open.  ever on any machine thats had firefox.
No thanks, I'd rather not hear the opinions of cult leaders.
Now *that's* fair and balanced!
And who would have thought . . . it figures.
I think cyclists are generally just hated. Drivers dislike them on the roads because they are slower and tend to be more erratic (especially if they don't know the road rules.) While pedestrians hate them on the sidewalks as they are too fast and dodge around people.  Likewise cyclists hate you too. When I'm cycling on the road I hate people who are walking down the side of the road when there is a perfectly fine footpath available. I hate cars that treat the cyclists lane as an extra buffer for their very poor reverse-parallel-park. (Forcing cyclists onto the main traffic lane, or to stop completely because they don't know how to park their car.) Also people who don't look when they open their car doors into traffic. (Which is actually illegal in Australia and New Zealand.) Since NZ is trying to be a greener-cyclist friendly country there is a large amount of advertising activity about teaching drivers to look out for cyclists when they open their car door into traffic. In fact you will be fined on the spot if you just fling your car door open without looking. (A little draconian, but completely necessary if they are serious about the safety of cyclists.)
In other news, oxygen is good for you. Shooting yourself hurts. Shoes protect your feet from the elements.
Okay let me try to map these English statements to logical statements.  This more detailed work is totally different than my example above as I took more time to think it out.  But its been way too long since I worked with Mod Polens and Mod Tolens et all.  So much of this is kiddie logic.  &gt; Question 15. &gt; a) Water is a molecule composed of two hydrogen atoms and one oxygen atom.   This is simple, its simply a definition.   I say that we simply call it P.  But, we could say that its really a compound statement.  "Water is a molecule" and "Water is H2O".  You could even expand it further with a conclusion.  "H is an elemental atom", "Elemental atoms are immutable", or do you say "Elemental atoms come in in various isotopes" therefore "Not all H atoms are the same".  But we are not supposed to bring any of our interpretive baggage along, I think we only need;  *Assume P*  Assume "Water is a molecule composed of two hydrogen atoms and one oxygen atom."  &gt; b) Every observation or examination by microscope has confirmed this.   "Every observation by microscope" or "Every examination by microscope" is problematic here.  Both when trying to connect these to the word "future" and to the "or".  Is "examination" the same word as "observation"?  Remember, we can't bring our own assumptions into this.  So lets be strict and assume that they have distinct meanings.  Therefore we have;  *Q implies P or R implies P*  "Every observation by microscope" implies "Water is a molecule composed of two hydrogen atoms and one oxygen atom."  or  "Every examination by microscope" implies "Water is a molecule composed of two hydrogen atoms and one oxygen atom."   &gt; Conclusion &gt; Therefore we can predict that every future examination of this molecule will reveal the same chemical composition.  The conclusion is compound and has a hidden assumption.  *assume S implies R*  If it is an "every future examination by microscope" it is an "Every examination by microscope"  *therefore S implies P*  Therefore we can predict that "every future examination by microscope" will reveal this "Water molecule is a molecule composed of two hydrogen atoms and one oxygen atom." So what do we now have?  * *assume p*  * *assume q implies p or r implies p*  * *assume s implies r*   So I guess I reverse my stance.  * *therefore s implies p*  Not valid is it?   therefore r(by using #3) implies p  but #2 says only, either q implies p or r implies p.  It could be that "every observation by microscope" has not observed this. I powned myself here.  Oh well.
Trailer.
It's slightly less funny when you realize it's a fake. (post count is screwed up, none of the text is indexed on google, etc)
you still have your prep pdfs?
Lew Rockwell, eh?  http://www.reason.com/news/show/124426.html
We used this picture on BIG signs outside the Republican debate in FL! Even the reporter commented on this hilarious photo: http://www.palmbeachpost.com/politics/content/south/epaper/2008/01/25/m1a_DEBATE_BINO_0125.html  -FAU College Democrats
it's a method of reducing the needless congestion and pollution in the centre of london whilst at the same time increasing money for public transport.  As someone who doesn't drive and gets lots of buses in london, I must say that red ken's reign has been superb.  Charging those who demand the right to drive in to town, so those of us who are sensible enough not to, get a better service sits OK with me.
Seth is the best =) 
Amen!
ditto to your words, as well as the menthols Buck_Malibu I don't want someone else dictating my future because I've not hurt anyone, I'll face my future myself when the time comes - as it does to everyone.
&gt; Yes. It is.  Which question or comment are you answering?  Are you saying that America is at war and so is Israel and that I am wrong in saying that this isn't America's war?  &gt; Try Tikkun for an alternative and more progressive Jewish opinion.  I am familiar with Tikkun, and the rest of the progressive Jewish community.  I support some of it financially.  &gt; Commentary will find Obama speaking to muslims as people worthy of being heard anathema.  Commentary is the probably the worst expression of Jewish opinion on the web.  Its unfortunate.  &gt; Where Hillary stands is clear. I am not sure I like it it but I understand it.  Not totally sure.  Marty Peretz had a piece on Obama today in which he defined the positions and said that Obama was kosher.  http://tnr.com/politics/story.html?id=6bd11ed5-bf80-44a0-b683-a0563e11ab89
Why do you care so much about karma that you had to post about it? who gives a fuck about website stats?
"pretty"? I'm assuming this has a 'Pretty Woman' slant, AKA the movie.  So, is she a whore?  Sorry, can't be bothered to read the article.
Agreed.  Any idea why this was banned?
It was a joke guys, pot isn't always needed.
The reason I suggested he was using a dupe account is because he has only made one post or comment, ever, and it was this one. If he has a Digg account, and created this Reddit account just to post, then he falls into the second category I mentioned, which is that my comment is what motivated him to actually sign up for a reddit account.  As for feeling oppressed--yeah, you're repeating exactly what I said. Yes, I'm sure he gets some shit for being religious on Reddit and Digg. That's why I said, if you have a hard time with that, imagine what it is like to be a regular American and also be an open atheist, where we are the most hated minority group, and politician regularly announce that all good Americans are God-fearing, and that religion is what makes this country great, etc., etc.
Yeah... I went back to reality too. 
Oh I see that now. Thanks. It reminds me of Paulson and Bernaste three months ago.
And why is he inauthentic? Because he's good-looking; or perhaps because the media told you so? Silly boy.
\* Who is, or Who's
I don't consider science to be religion.  What's your definition of the word religion?
Hey, SOCIOPATH: There are *EXTERNAL CONSEQUENCES* to your actions. 
Of all the things to have happened in the world that I have today heard news of, this friends, was the only tale that filled me with sorrow. Farewell, good hamster.
I wonder what resolution monitor you would need to see that? 1200 X 768^25?
Simple solution: Don't skip non-pic submissions.
Over half or Norway's economy is oil and gas.  While that is currently very advantageous, that won't always be the case.  For every Norway, there is a Cuba that has not leveraged their natural resources.  Look at the ratio of natural resources to population, and you have an easy answer to why they are so successful.  As for free markets?  Norway is very much successful because of the free market in oil.   Had Norway been part of the USSR and been forced to sell or transfer their oil at fixed costs would they be better off?  Clearly no.
They could because even 3 years ago stock options would still make you a lot of money. Nowaday's I'm not as sure about my options:)
Once you go black you never go back? Sorry, couldn't resist. Go 'bama! 
He should have his picture taken next to the headstone, then have the image sandblasted/etched onto the headstone.   I bet that's never been done before.  Gotta have a sense of humor about it, after all.
Fear of punishment is a good start to convince people to behave morally.  Obviously you want people to eventually mature but to imagine that a 4 year old will, without any imposed structure, learn to behave morally is silly.  its a version of the libertarian fallacy.  Face it: people need to be cultivated and the good gardener knows when to clip as well as when to fertilize.
good luck outlawing everything that is harmful.
Frederick admitted that he had a small amount of marijuana. So if the cops planted the pot (which I wouldn't find hard to believe in most cases) they were framing a guilty man.
In other news, the entire state of Mississippi is stuck in the 19th century, morally speaking.  Sounds like a bunch of guys with small wangs cooked up that law.   "Dag gummit! We can't seem to keep our wives satisfied with our miniscule peckers. Them newfangled vibrator thingamajigs are ruinin' our sex lives. Lets OUTLAW them electrical rascals once and for all!"  Dildo Johnson for President.
I can't wait to see this city Gear up for the project.
&gt; Murray Rothbard is not the end-all and be-all of Austrian economics.  I have to choose someone to criticize.  If there's someone else you think is more worthy, I'll happily aim my deconstruction cannon in that direction.  &gt; It has been a while since I've read any Rothbardian theory, but my &gt; recollection of his take on utility functions was that utility &gt; functions are dependent upon systematic value judgments -- and thus &gt; inappropriate for study of economics  Are you actually familiar with mainstream economics, or just the Austrian caricature of it?  Rothbard should understand that utility functions have nothing necessarily to do with external value judgments. Utility functions are merely part of a rather useful model under which human beings approximate utility maximizing agents.  It's a *model*, so first of all, it's about explanatory and predictive power more than "truth," and second, no one is imposing global utility judgments on anyone with such a model.  &gt; &gt; In every market transaction, all participants benefit. Government action always helps some at the expense of others. &gt; Citation, please. I'm not familiar with that formulation.  It was imprecise of me to call these axioms.  They are actually trivial derivations from the axiom of action.  See Rothbard, *Power and Market*, page 13, for the former.  The latter is from Joseph Salerno, though he claims to derive it from Rothbard.  (http://www.springerlink.com/content/v768462227258202/ if you have access.)  &gt; &gt; Only preferences that can be observed in action are real. &gt; I'm not familiar with that specific formulation, either. Citation?  It's my paraphrase, and I don't have time to dig up specific references too much.  Here's a quote from *Man, Economy, and State*, regarding public goods:  &gt; As for the recipients, they are being forced by the State to pay for benefits that they otherwise would not have purchased. How can we say that they "benefit"? A standard reply is that the recipients "could not" have obtained the benefit even if they wanted to buy it voluntarily. The first problem here is by what mysterious process the critics know that the recipients would have liked to purchase the "benefit." Our only way of knowing the content of preference scales is to see them revealed in concrete choices. Since the choice concretely was not to buy the benefit, there is no justification for outsiders to assert that B's preference scale was "really" different from what was revealed in his actions.  Like I said before, behaviorism is silly.  I might prefer to own a yacht, but nothing in my action reveals this preference, because I can't afford a yacht.  To Rothbard, if there's no action to indicate that preference, it simply doesn't exist.  But it does exist, and if I came into some money later, my action might at that point demonstrate it.  &gt; It is useful for a number of purposes, but not as useful for evaluating the efficiacy of economic policy as praxeology, given equivalent levels of useful input.  Here you differ with both Rothbard and Mises.  See Rothbard, "In defence of 'extreme apriorism,'" wherein he argues that empirical  observation cannot be used to test praxeology, because praxeology deduces things that are "absolutely true."  His epistemology is plain nuts.  &gt; Do you know what an externality is, in economics terms? If so, I think you must be using "rejection" in a manner with which I'm not familiar. Please clarify this statement.  I'm using it in the standard sense of the effect of some action on uninvolved third-parties.  Clearly the Austrians cannot reject such as things a priori (though they might like to), but rather may claim that externalities are simply failures of the market.  Anyone that suggests that property rights could be assigned to every liter of air is probably unfamiliar with transaction costs theory.  &gt; &gt; The idea that we can figure out economics through pure reason, and that economic history and data are irrelevant &gt; . . . isn't the foundation of the Austrian school that you seem to think it is.  I will take Mises and Rothbard's word for it over yours on this one.  &gt; Nothing wrong with that, in and of itself -- especially since government got involved in the business of sanctioning unions and giving them special legal privileges.  Government got involved when it created the framework for capitalism in the first place.  Without a whole array of public goods, we'd still have a primitive barter economy.  It's only reasonable that it should stay involved to temper some of capitalism's excesses.  When market conditions inordinately favor the powerful, *doing nothing* is actually tilting the scale in favor of powerful players, since only government action creates the conditions for a market in the first place.  Wage negotiations, especially for the poorest of workers, do *not* occur on the open market.  There is a powerful element of coercion involved, because when the choice is to either work for $6/hr or not eat, that is not a choice.  The state, as you accurately point out, endows the corporation with special privileges (such as existence), and yet for some reason giving special privileges to workers in the form of some union protections is looked upon as interference in the market.  Walmart doesn't close the store because they fear that store, or any store, becoming unprofitable.  They close the store because they know that should unionization succeed at any store, it will soon spread to many others.  No union wants the business to be unprofitable, but that would not be the consequence of Walmart paying a decent wage, but it might shrink their margins a little.  Someone in management might have to wait until next year to replace his yacht, and we can't have that.  When I look at economic history for the last century, I see the same pattern over and over: State intervention has massively improved the lot of millions of ordinary people.  The New Deal and the Great Society were landmark achievements.  On the other hand, non-intervention has often been the cloak for policies that implicitly favor a privileged few.  That may not be the intent of everyone that promotes non-interventionist policy, but it seems to be the inevitable result.
Finally!  Through all this empty rhetoric, you admit that "the tendency" is that "the poor spend a larger percentage of their income than the rich."  Therefore, we can say that the sales tax *tends* to be regressive.  I know that is slightly different than saying the sales tax *is* regressive, but I can live with it. &gt;I know you are, but what am I?" is not a logically valid argument form. So let me get this straight:  If you say I'm not listening to you and not making any points, that is logical.  But if I say you're not listening to me and not making any points, that is not logical?  It sounds like you are applying one set of logic to yourself and a totally different set to me. 
They're knowns as "Chelsea Tractors", and they're actually one of the prime targets for the charge.  There's nowhere to off-road in London, why does anyone need a 4x4
And lost a friend. Anything else?
Canadian cops must be bored, just like the cops in my hometown were bored when they chased us for pulling shit.  Not sure how affixing a magnet to a car constitutes vandalism, though.  Sure, support the 2500 Canadian troops in Afghanistan.  At least they aren't helping us (US) rape Iraq.
Hey, what's up?
You could probably even do the same thing without being in control of the hotspot, just by spoofing RST packets to interrupt the SSL connection.
?
Took physics for philosophical reasons, successfully.
Sorry. The article was about hypothesis and proof. I thought it was relevant.
Very happy with my download the eye download!  I finally found  a place where the quality is clear and crisp. You'll love it too!
What's with the extremist sky-is-gonna-fall bullshit? Just because the man wants to minimize government doesn't mean our asses are going to be out in the wind. Honestly, you just look stupid making paranoid leaps of "logic" like this. 
Your false pride is your undoing.  Whether you know it or not, eventually you're going to realize that I am deprogramming you. Please, continue - I'm looking forward to learning how long it will take you to come to your senses and stop this foolishness.   
The First Act as president? why not as first act end the war, bring back the troop and stablize the our country before it goes bankrupt?
[A chapstick entering the Luray Caverns](http://www.devilducky.com/media/61582/)(sfw). 
Agreed.  Personally I only drive when I absolutely have to, ie. wherever there is no bus service.  The problem is that 99% of traffic is automobiles.  One cyclist can cause huge delays for dozens of cars.  Whereas pedestrians on sidewalks are not that common (at least in my city), and even if bikes must slow down considerably i feel that it is better for a few bikers to slow down for pedestrians than to have hundreds of cars slowing down for a bike.  Traffic is bad enough without bikes on the road causing flow problems.
Maybe a little exaggeration.  But, man, I watched the whole thing and they sure all felt like lies...especially when RP called them out. 
heh. oh snap. good point.
Baby steps.
i think the many of these are shitty, including the mean joe green commercial, which this site says is most memorable.  ya know what? i only remember it because faggots and shitfaced losers like the author of this site keep bringing it up.  every year, every god damned year someone has to say that the mean joe green commercial is the best commercial ever, well, quite frankly it isn't.  the commercial is sub-par and on the same level as just about any commercial selling shit to little kids on cartoon network.  and for some reason, you dont like the commercial and vocally express that opinion, you get stares from empty eyes as if to say, "what the **fuck** is wrong with you, that you don't think this commercial is cute."  well i'll tell you what is wrong with me: i am not a fucking idiot, i can see through the logical fallacies of authority and pathos.  i know that coke only really cares about selling me a fucking god damned drink.  i've seen commercials that i thought were on par with art, and this one sure as fucking hell isn't one of those.
&gt; You can easily put an ATV on a trailer but which is more convenient? Using a truck that is designed for such  You can easily drive a truck in the city, but which is more convenient?  Using a car that was designed for such scenarios, or driving a truck around a cramped city?  The issue here is a vehicle that does BOTH, you're focusing on one or the other.  Therefore, I must ask - do you fucking get it?  Do I know if he has a place to store a trailer?  Well, gee, if he has a place to store an ATV, I'm guessing he might have a place to store a trailer too.
If you don't want Hillary but Obama is OK, and yet they're identical, then what's the big deal? Why not vote for Hillary? Damn Republican logic is always mind-blowing.
Many inexperienced drivers simply don't know what to do when there is a cyclist. Some give way too much buffer when driving around, or go so slowly that they actually impede the cyclist. (Driving slowly along side a cyclist is dangerous for the cyclist as the cyclist often has to swerve around minor obstacles such as branches and incorrectly parked cars.) The best way to treat a cyclist is just to minimise the time you are next to them - and recognise that if their lane ends (which they often do) they will be merging into the main body of traffic.(or using a sidewalk if available.)
Did anyone else think this was gonna link to a Linux distro?
Excellent. The Jewish history requires that both "Hebrew" and "slave" must be used. The Palestinian legacy requires only a single word "Palestinian". When one uses the word Palestinian, it combines all forms of struggle into one word--oppression, genocide, landlessness, leaderlessness, slaughter, and a thousand other words--all for much longer than the Jews suffered through, and so out of Israel's pathetic attempts to oppress the Palestinians comes only a fiercer determination to overcome. What the Jews have endured are nothing compared to what the Palestinians have endured, and what the Jews have accomplished will be nothing compared to what the Palestinians will accomplish.
Plus prosecutors will just exclude any potential nullifiers from the jury. They always ask if you agree with drug laws, if you'd convict someone under them, etc. 
Maybe is picking Bush's pocket?
That guy should be dick cheney's/G.W's cell-mate   ..yeah   wishful thinking  Imagine this guy going George who's your daddy??  56 inch chest blam!
Bush: It's gonna be alright McCheney, your turn is coming.  McCain: I wish you were my daddy.
Wouldn't matter. Someone would complain because you aren't designing for 800 x 600.
I don't, as i said before i was simply curious.   I study people's actions on a professional basis, so knowing how and why people vote they way they do here, allows me to better understand this online community a bit more.  Hell, i knew this post would open me up for people to down my points.
Ahhh, another great story about the Religion of Peace.
I think you need recognise the authority of the queen again, and be subsumed back into the British empire.
Runs good in safe mode!
Thank-you. I'm a little rusty. :)
Having run both Linux and BSD (to a lesser extent) for 10 years, I've found many more drivers available for Linux.  The gap has been widening over the last few years as Linux gains more vendor interest.  Dell is now shipping Ubuntu pre-installed on desktops and laptops in the US with plans to sell in Europe this year.  The FFS file system is looking rather long in the tooth.  The article compares it with ext2fs which has not been standard in Linux distros since ext3 came out (1999).  In Linux, you also have IBM's JFS, XFS, and ext4.  Sun now has ZFS.  Compared to these file systems, FFS looks very last century.  If you want a BSD-like experience, you can get close with Slackware Linux.
I bet your SUV has never had 9 people and a dog in it. The vast majority of SUVs are not sold for their designed purpose and do not exist in your rural area.
A variation of that joke got me out of a horrendous slew of tickets one night - a couple of weeks before, I was at the barber shop, and told one of the barbers that joke while a client was getting his haircut.  Didn't think anything of it.  2 weeks later, breaking all kinds of traffic laws ( I was young ), I looked over to see the a cop pulling me over.  He walks up to the car, explains the 4 things that I could've lost my license for, but then says "I'll let you go, because you're a funny guy".  I'm really surprised, mutter something like "Huh?".  The cop's like "Yeah, the son of a bitch fish", and explains that he's the guy who was getting his hair cut.  Let's me off, tells me to have a joke for him the next time I see him having his hair cut.  And to renew my driver's license immediately.  
&gt;I wasn't getting on "weed", just pointing out the fact that there's a lot of shit that "regular" people ingest that's a lot more harmful, and they don't even realize it.  I understood you.  I was just pointing out that there ARE lots of studies telling us that darn near everything we eat is bad for us - they aren't singling out marijuana. Besides, my common sense meter has always said that smoking anything - especially unfiltered - has to increase your chances of lung cancer.  It only makes sense. I am a Libertarian (and thus, much maligned here on reddit) and I don't care WHAT you do and I don't think it is anyone's business.  If I want to eat a rare, bloody filet mignon and you want to bake out - cool with me. &gt;We won't even get into the shit that's in simple tap water. And they make fun of me for using distilled water to make my baby's formula. &gt;Hell, if anything, I think the world needs to pack a few more bowls and chill the fuck out. ...perhaps yourself included. Nah, I think you misread me.  Maybe.  I was just calling you on the carpet for a statement that I felt wasn't quite accurate. And injecting a small bit of humor by suggesting you take a smoke to relax - considering the thread we are in.  Uptight I am not. &gt;And just to clarify, I smoke cigarettes -menthol no less. I know that I'm putting trash into my body. point is, we all are, simply by breathing "fresh air", putting cancer into ourselves. That's a bit misleading.  Being ALIVE increases your chance for getting lung cancer.  Depending on where you live and what you do for a living, you may have a significantly higher risk of lung cancer based on the air you breath. But smoking raises that chance by orders of magnitude over breathing mildly polluted air. &gt;The best drug I ever beat was trying to carry the weight of the world on my shoulders. To each their own. Yeah, that is why I became a Libertarian.  I was a Republican when I was younger and I was convinced I knew what was right for me and everyone else.  Now I am just convinced that I know what is right for me and my family and would like for everyone else to leave me alone and let me do that. I only carry a few people now, the rest of them can figure it out for themselves. :-)
You could always google earlier articles for the details.  Several neighbors (one of whom was outside watching) say they didn't hear any announcements before the door was broken down.
I liked him until he started sucking up to the evangelicals.
Wal-Mart has made life better for poor people in America. Their profits come at the expense of middle men corporations.  They have also made life better for many workers in China, who are creeping towards a "middle class".  Have you ever seen a Wal-Mart pre-opening? The lines for jobs are around the block. You think those people could get a job as an accountant? Forget about it. They increase the options for unskilled labor, not decrease.
Sounds like an astrotheological reference to me. The two female bears, a mother and her cub, could represent the constellations Ursa Major and Minor circling around the pole star. The story of Jesus cursing the fig tree is also interesting. Jesus or the Sun, causes leaves to wither and fall happening at the appropriate time in the Gospel story.
some democracy you guys got , USA USA USA
Blind faith based on groundless experience.
&gt;But from what I've seen, I feel that no act of volition will take you anyplace but "you".&lt;  Maybe "toss out" the "you" as well? From my very limited knowledge about Buddhism "I am" seems to be "the problem." As getting rid of my desires would lead me to become a "vegetable." That is how I feel. It seems as I would have to become uninterested in everything. So perhaps, the way to go is to forget about yourself completely, as well. Even knowledge, as what purpose does it have when you have no goal to attain?  This, of course, seems to contradict the texts.  Edit: It sure as heck does not sound like any kind of definition for happiness either.
I would bet that Frederick was afraid for his life and not just defending his "inanimate property."
And you call yourself the grammar nazi?
Hey - your xml syntax is invalid....
Is this a serious question?  In case it is, probably because someone was worried it would offend people.
My dad's more of an Obama freak than I am, so that's taken care of. My mom likes Hillary because she's a woman and because hillary is married to bill. In other words, for the wrong reasons. I'll keep trying, but she hasn't done any research and seems to think clinton is somehow immune from anything I say to the contrary. We need to come up with a strong Obama strategy for moms.
In other news, a new study shows that most studies are wrong.  http://www.newscientist.com/article.ns?id=dn7915
Ass jihad is now a meme  haha tuba fart!!!!
Ron Paul. Although Obama is more likely and probably better for America(his social plans are more in keeping with my own political views), Ron Paul has a better view of forign relatinos, and would be much nicer to the rest of the world.
First I would have to *get* to downtown, which is about 10 miles from here.  :) I understand some people like to ride bikes.  I even understand that some people like them so much that they're willing to limit their destinations to bikable places and risk life and limb every day.  I'm not one of those people.
Do you want to translate for us? I cannot conceive of any circumstances under which that cut would have made sense.
[They are trying!](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/List_of_smoking_bans_in_the_United_States) [It get's worse!](http://www.washingtonpost.com/ac2/wp-dyn/A39239-2003Aug9?language=printer)   
Simply put, I think it means fines instead of time.
Wow, man, I think you went waaay past the "stuff random people on the internet care about" threshold there!
So you guys are essentially saying that this city is gonna Gear up to make a mesh out of COGnitive dissonance? Or is it just me?
2 + 2 = 5
I thought he was announcing that he and Huckabee had jointly decided to drop out.
Whose *to say* is it? My *to say*? Your *to say*? Must be someone else's *to say*.
Bike Rack on your Prius trunk FTW.
&gt;But again, no, they're not there to look out for me, they're just covering their own asses.  Clearly you have a much deeper understanding of medical ethics and the hippocratic oath than I could ever dream of. You're entirely right, we built that hospital and in fact the entire legacy of medicine entirely to cover our own asses.
Heres some music I made its drum and bass and techno. For the drunk monkey in you! http://torrents.thepiratebay.org/4006050/Dj_Nosajman.4006050.TPB.torrent
register?  no, thanks.  learn to linkjack.
Know what?  I'm voting this one UP.  People should see the racism, xenophobia, and faux legal analysis that undergirds the unsavory side of Paul's base.  I could do without the company of racists, and I can wait for a libertarian candidate who doesn't come with this baggage.  Shame.
I did. And I hate doing that, but making a point and ruining a thread are two entirely different things.  He made his point in one post, and I agree and I'm sure subby learned his lesson after just one post.
I really want to like Obama and I certainly put him over Hillary/McCain/Romney, but that still doesn't make him a *good* candidate. He's very much a whore for Israel like Hillary. He's sure in his own mind that Iran is meddling with us and trying to acquire nukes. There are many other issues he takes a poor stance on as well.
More hours worked doesn't necessarily mean there was an increase in productivity.
When I was a kid I had a gerbil named einstein for a couple of years. I loved that guy absolutely to death. When he finally got old and kicked the bucket.. I gave him a Klingon burial and buried him with a knife while screaming.  It was a good day to die.
why do you need a trailer for snowboards or bikes? Here's what he needs... and a Prius.  http://www.prolineracks.com/Yakima-king-joe-car-bike-racks.html
Yep.  conundri nailed it...
Minimal threat?  As in the largest theft of documents in the history of the federal government?  This doesn't bother you?
Quit posting that shit.  No one cares.  No one buys into your stupid fucking conspiracy theories.  You could at least mix it up a little rather than copy and paste the same post every time.
"A policeman who was almost certainly not alone, was uniformed, was shouting warnings the entire time he was in the building and yet still went out guns blazing."  You don't know any of that. He was probably uniformed... in all black kevlar like a freakin' soldier. And the neighbors reported not hearing any warnings yelled by the cops.  Phone the police and hide!  HAHAHAHA!  You Europeans (or Canadians or whatever) are like laughable little children. At least Americans try to take care of themselves.
Do you drive a Chrysler?
The point is here that most people will already understand what this sentence means. By trying to force it out of the realm of conversation and into the realm of precise scientific language, you're not going to reach a wider audience, just a smaller one.  The theory issue is the underlying problem of this line of logic that I'm constantly seeing in the scientific community. Using scientific language instead of casual makes perfect sense to people who use it all the time, and they really can't see how a regular person might misunderstand it. However, these misunderstandings are already happening all the time, yet for some reason the scientific community refuses to acknowledge the evidence that their ideas on how to clarify things to people outside their realm doesn't do much besides alienating them.
&gt; has a large, powerful, ***accountable*** federal government. Period.  Fixed that for you. :)
Two reasons...  * Cluster Size (and slack) i.e. A 1 byte file allocates 4K of disk space.  * There is less wasted slack space on the CD, since all the files have been compressed together in 1 file versus a few thousand files on the Hard Drive. All that wasted slack on files add up.
Riding on the sidewalk has the added disadvantage of putting you in the position of hitting and seriously injuring a pedestrian. Because a pedestrian doesn't expect a bicycle to be careening down the sidealk, they walk blindly out of shops, not looking around and end up walking in front of an oncomming bike. Here in Japan that happens all the time...which is surprising here considering that bikes can go anywhere they want, road or sidewalk but most people stick to the sidewalks because the drivers are insane! So..they know that bikes are going to be on the sidewalks, and yet...they change direction suddenly, they don't walk in straight lines (although cyclyists don't seem abel to moe in strisight lines either so maybe it's just the japanese way to move forward diagonally) they walk out of shops and go straight agross the sidewalk, or they congregate in the middle of the sidealk obscuring foot as well as bike traffic.  For me I think I would rather brave the drivers. A least I can only get killed by a car. If I hit a pedestrian, I will get sued!
that excellent. cheesy taglines made me slightly unhappy.
oh reddit, you perplex me.  Link to this story on pagesix.com, get no upmods.  Link to it on some shitty blog... front page.
Who cares about Kennedy, now he's the real deal!
this affected me in my vag.
I do it for the lulz. And since you didn't realize, **I** started this. But continue to enjoy your delusion of grandeur.  Who is more foolish? The fool, or the fool who follows him (which would be your continued replies)?  You're my little bitch.
We can put this on the top of the best-seller lists, that guarantees it a spot in thousands of bookstores. I'm buying a copy.
Excellent link, can't believe I've never seen it before.
If only more Americans resembled libertarian zealots... this would be a much better place to live. Our greatest founding Fathers (Jefferson, especially) were basically libertarian zealots.
Well pucker my ass and call me Shirley. Fox just moved right into the realm of Satire.  I can't even take it serious enough to be alarmed by it, other than the fact that too many people actually believe that shit.
I find this photo much more alarming.  http://images.usatoday.com/news/_photos/2006/11/08/clinton-2008.jpg
there's no trick to it.  it's just a simple trick.
Not my favorite Hicks bit, but I am physically, ethically and morally incapable of downmodding any Bill Hicks material.  The man was spot on, and anyone who hasn't heard him needs to remedy the situation quickly.
&gt; I have the legal right to make whatever maneuver I want to defend my space No, you have the right to make whatever maneuver you NEED to to defend...blah blah blah
I got it after a few seconds.
There should be a place in your town where you can ask why the stop sign is there, and you can try to get them to remove it if not. I've heard of some that were put there because there are schools nearby (those often with a note), or lots of children or old people.  There's also a not so small difference between "Not coming to a full stop" and "What stop sign?" :)
US peak oil wasn't until the 1970s and continued at high levels into the 1980s. 
I agree with your first part, that most of the preferential treatment is a result of abuses to the system (i.e. lobbyists).   &gt; That is like saying that you if you buy twice as much food as someone else that you should pay more than twice as much for the food. Why?  My point is that government should provide food to the people. If you buy twice as much food than you pay twice as much. This translates into income, as if you make twice as much as me than you should pay twice as much. Assuming that your capital is what is generating the revenue for you, then twice as much income means twice as much capital, which means you have twice as much for the police and fire departments to protect.  That is why we should provide a percentage and not an absolute amount in taxes. It's proportional to the capital that you have and use to generate income.  Now if the government provides automobiles in addition to food, then we should pay more. Those people that choose to buy cars should pay the extra money while those that just buy food, pay for the food. Therefore if the rich get extra benefits from the government, they should pay more.
You learn to see them not seeing you. I was recently watching this woman in a 4x4 turning round and yelling at her kids as she came up to an intersection. If I hadn't noticed that I'd have ended up under it. Gave her the fright of her life, which is some small consolation.
The monk then stabs the vendor with an ice pick.   Wait, what?
How is that ripping off Ron Paul? It's not like Ron Paul invented being in favor of legalization or decriminalization.
Another baby seal walks into a club. (This post is like a long road that needs its milestones. As in, "I've already read that two baby seals ago!")
And why was that 'general area' a civilian one?  Hezbollah had no targets to aim at:  They just shot at civilians.  Israel's reaction is hard to defend (the leadership should have been tossed out due to the mis-management of the conflict), but I can't see how Hezbollah's can be defended at all.  It's a shame people put blinders on and look for 'good guys' and 'bad guys' in situations like this.  The people in those photos should not be vilified and that's why I provided context for them here.
&gt;What is the reason for change then? For me it's because this country is so broken right now that I don't think we can survive another term of Republicans who have obvious personal agendas out weighing the needs of the nation.  Republicanism, true republicanism, did not do what has been done to this country. Bush is *not* a republican by any stretch of the imagination  &gt;I trust Obama, not to do everything he tries to do, but to not lie to me to further his agenda. I can't say that about any other candidate.  I don't think he's lying either, but it's not hard to be honest when you don't really say anything. The man is an incredible orator if only for the fact that he can sound so good saying so little of actual substance.   &gt;Also, in my opinion, you lose credibility when you say there is no policy difference between McCain, Obama, Romney, and Clinton.  There really isn't. They're all statists. None of them are advocating an immediate withdraw from Iraq. None of them plan on cutting spending. They don't have any intention of restoring personal liberty; only to shift where the liberty they take from individuals is placed. Philosophically there is no difference. Policy-wise their differences are mostly in the way they would implement their statist approach to government.  &gt;Get over the race issue, if you can't, you're probably racist.   Did you even read what I wrote?  &gt;I think electing a black president (and having him successfully complete his term) would do wonders to move our country in the right direction in terms of our cultural evolution  Seriously, what the fuck are you even talking about?
Subject title =  &gt;Post the Funniest Joke You Know... Upmod the Best One 
Why not?
I'm still not s big fan of Apple... tho I do respect them.
Then you're breaking the law, and should be pulled over just like I would in my car.
Ban this fucker's IP already.
Question: Is it possible for Fox News to be #1, yet suffer a ratings drop?  I believe it is.
I suspect Mr. Williams may have been aware he was on the way out *before* his burst of independence.
Sorry, let me explain: When I met with the psychiatrist, he was really nice and apologized for all the bullshit I went through, and explained that they only do that because a lot of "suicide patients" who decided to leave would end up killing themselves, which got the hospital in a lot of trouble, so they decided not to let *anybody* leave, to be safe.
or anyone technically minded.  elitism doesn't help.
I'm afraid I can't. Just giving them a benefit of doubt I guess.
McCain deserves to have his opinion on this issue, however he does not deserve his shot at the presidency. He was NOT born in the United States. He was born in Panama. Our Constitution only allows for Naturally born citizens to run for office.
&gt; Trails have trees and(soft) people.  And what's most of the time next to the trail? The road, with exactly those dangerous cars and dogs(?) on it :)
solution: don't use the word 'government'. Refer to them as 'the man'. That should help you slip through the censors. 
&gt; If the pursuit of knowledge arrives at conclusions that do not agree with what you wish to be true, you declare it evil. Good to know.  No.  If a particular methodology reaches erroneous conclusions, and when people following those conclusions then find that what they hoped would happen doesn't, I declare it erroneous.  You claimed that because no value judgments are made, the theory is politically irrelevant.  That's just wrong.  &gt; This probably seems like a reasonable statement when you think you know what all value judgments should be.  You are so full of herring.  We often know very well what people's value judgments will be, and that has absolutely nothing to do with thinking we know what they should be.  I haven't assumed anything about the purposes of all bridges or all economic policies, but the point stands that when we make supposedly neutral observations or predictions, people *will* combine those observations with their own values on the way to action.  If Austrian economics reached true conclusions that I didn't much like, I wouldn't have so much a problem with it; if it reached false conclusions that no one cared about, I would care even less.  But since it reaches false conclusions that, if followed, have enormous and terrible consequences, I think it's deserving of heaps of bile and scorn.  When it reaches those conclusions by way of an absurd-on-its-face epistemology, we rightly add derision to the mix.
Hell yeh, tax em all.   Stupid as SUV's. I dont mind when people actually us them, but around my city all but 2 of them are clean and never used for "Sports or Utility"
That was my reasoning, but I suppose some definitions of "predict" require predictions to be accurate.  Mine still doesn't.
If you run a stop sign then you lose absolutely all of your credibility to bitch about anybody else's driving habits.
If you just want to admit you're John Stossel I won't hold it against you. You've made a number of errors in the previous post: 1.  Step 2 is:  ?  2.  Step 3 is: profit.  3.  Grammatically you shouldn't have a word ending in a vowel followed by a word beginning with one. &gt;No I'm just insane... I agree.
I have nothing against Ron Paul. Most of his points are good. However, I cannot support someone who does not believe in evolution.
&gt;Social security is a contractual obligation  Boy are you naive!  [Flemming v. Nestor](http://www.ssa.gov/history/nestor.html):  "In this 1960 Supreme Court decision Nestor's denial of benefits was upheld even though he had contributed to the program for 19 years and was already receiving benefits. Under a 1954 law, Social Security benefits were denied to persons deported for, among other things, having been a member of the Communist party. Accordingly, Mr. Nestor's benefits were terminated. He appealed the termination arguing, among other claims, that promised Social Security benefits were a contract and that Congress could not renege on that contract. **In its ruling, the Court rejected this argument and established the principle that entitlement to Social Security benefits is not contractual right.**"
holy intergalactic goatse
This is Reddit, after all.  When they do it, it's a conspiracy; when we do it, it's democracy.
Finally found a site that I was able to download Strange Wilderness and the quality Rocks! Get yours now!
Excellent code from an excellent prolog programmer.
Dennis Kucinich, Ralph Nader, Ron Paul, Barack Obama, in order of preference.
Grieving.
But if it's just decriminalized, it might stay that way, that's my fear. "Hell, we decriminalized it, that should be good enough!" You know a lot of people are going to think that way, sames ones who think "Hell, we made alcohol legal, that should be good enough!"
I know - dead animals aren't funny. But I got to thinking: Why? Why so many ferrets. Ferrets are creeping and skinny and look like they bite.
Check the back, right before the index.
&gt;It is a absurd to say that 4WD isn't going to be useful in snow.  It's useful for getting over snowbanks (like those left by plows) if two of your wheels get stuck, but that's about it.  Most of the time you're more worried about not being able to stop than not being able to go, and 4WD does nothing at all for your stopping ability.  ABS is much more useful to have in those situations.
I think the 1 is there so we don't feel bad about having a huge negative score.
Bzzt.  Your dogma is showing.  Back to rhetoric 101 for you son.
Modded up for the same reason. Bill Hicks rules.
Never judge a teaching by it's followers!
I'll forgive them if they immediately make rule 420 to take its place
I don't think he was being sarcastic, alphabeat is really going to steal your windows identity.
Looks like they got Warren Ellis' graphic designer.
How important is the wrestlemania demographic in elections?
I have an even better idea. Any member that votes to go to war is required to enlist in the military as a front line lieutenant and give up their seat to an elected "vice-whatever" for the duration of combat.
If you look into his past, he's not a staunch ally of Israel, that is what is upsetting many people of a certain persuasion, esp. his ties to Zbigniew Brezinsky. Hillary is clearly bought and paid for in this regard. Ron Paul ofcourse is in another league.
Usually at this point I bring up the anectote from when I once was in Munich, where a Mercedes came straight at me on the sidewalk (that was about as wide as the car).
What are you talking about?  It works just fine in ie, so it must be right.
Did you even bother to RTFA? This is due to  accelerated nuclear decay during the first     three days of the Creation Week ...
sorry, interesting but downvoted for the karma whoring "Vote Up if"
pwned
 Ford's Transit Connect delivery van, already sold in Europe, is expected to go on sale in the U.S. in 2009.
Well, for the sake of all things good, I'm gonna upmod your comment. Well thought-out, made your point.  Nothing wrong with a little disagreement, even if we're on the same page.  You've earned my respect just by simply making your child's formula with distilled water. Some might say you're a nut, but I think you actually care.  As far as your political affiliation... last I checked, it was still America, and you still(might)have the right to have one.
i hate to break it to you, but this submission isn't going to help much.
I didn't download your torrent because I assume you suck.
People using the airlines should pay for the air traffic control.  I am vegetarian, why should someone like me pay for your meat to be inspected?
Hey, don't forget AMERICAN Gladiators too.  You don't get much more patriotic than that.
Quick! Everyone buy more SUVs!
When I was a kid I had a gerbil named einstein for a couple of years. I loved that guy absolutely to death. When he finally got old and kicked the bucket.. I gave him a Klingon burial and buried him with a knife while screaming.  It was a good day to die.
Very true!!  If you look at the total death count due to handguns in the U.S., you'll see Americans **ARE** taking care of themselves!
trust me dude  clients dont care what kind of jargon you throw at them....  if the client has it in their head they want something and thinks it looks good...by god thats whats going to happen
Look if your going to go over there, you'll need a sidekick. I can be that sidekick. You'll need breaks, for a smoke or beer. I can then take over the fight. 
On his website he's pretty adamant about Israel. If elected, I doubt he'd be flimsy about it. Seems a requirement now to be Israel's whore.
BTW you should use the name Moynihan in the title as for many people it is a significant name.  Although in this case, it is just the wife of the former senator.
They would (and do) lay people off to make their shareholders happy though, regardless of job performance. 
the correct phrase was "I've gotten much lulz from it while walking past the bus stop."
"I took the time to look at the pictures and can transcribe english."
Holy shit, if this is true, it's HUGE!
Oh, he's on that?  I never watch those types of shows.
It slides out of what was formerly the CD drive ...
It's sad when the reporters don't read the news.
Don't forget to gag him, his voice alone would send villagers to the hills.
And how old are you? I hope you're not an adult who thinks that burning cars is worse than genocide. And your complete lack of understanding language or logic makes you impossible to talk with. You keep spouting "I didn't MEAN that, I MEANT this" as though I'm meant to be psychic. If you cannot write what you mean, do not write at all.
Nice commercial.
Feelgood measure at best. SUVs aren't the problem. Internal combustion engines are the problem. Build 1000 nuclear plants and switch to electric cars. Global warming is over.
It was a lot funnier when it was submitted last month, without the text explaining the joke.
MISSION ACCOMPLISHED!
He knows that these are just issues brought up my mainstream media to divide the people and deviate from the real matters, economics and foreign policy. This is not his focus. He will not make them matter.
mmm, brass - seriously, wearing that would give  me a chubby right away....
With everyone wanting to paint him as a muslim terrorist, he's pandering. You should have seen the shock when people realized he was getting popular, he had to meet with AIPAC leaders and reassure them he wasn't going to put them all into concentration camps. I prefer how RP handled that. Hillary has allied herself with the pro-Israel left, Obama has allied himself with the Carter left.
It's a shame that they can even choose between the candidates. The fact that they do should depress everyone in this country.
SO KEEN! See how the others play nice? You will too...er, well you already are.
Like that money's gonna go to anything useful, anyway. It's just gonna add to the pool. I'm guessing only rich assholes drive SUVs in london, anyway.
&gt; is it likely to kill a biker if you try to pass them in their lane? yes.  From personal experience, I can say, no, not **likely**.  Could it happen?  Sure.  Is it dangerous for them to be on the road with vehicles over 10 times their mass?  Sure.  So far, I've been lucky, and so have the cyclists who insist on pretending that the cars around them never have to suddenly stop, and never suddenly turn.  &gt; and has a biker ever passed you unless you are stopped at a light? i'm guessing not.  Have you never driven in a city?  Happens all the time.  Bikes go in and through places that are incredibly dangerous, weaving back and forth through the cars and trucks they share the street with.  I'd be happy to share the road with them if they acted like a car, but instead they go from behind me, to beside me, to cutting across in the 8ish feet in front of me to slide up beside and around the truck in front of me. If that truck hit the brakes, *I* would be legally at fault, even though there's no time for me to actually drop back to give them room, because there's a presumption that the cyclist is never at fault -- a presumption many in this thread seem to share. :)
She gets a free 10 car, 2 helicopter police escort, and everyone else gets charged for their police visits.  Nice.
Women are brave.
No idea where I first saw it.
For 2USD or a taco-bell, whichever is cheaper.
Maybe you should get out of Iraq and get rid of the plutocrats who are robbing you. The rest of the western world gets free universal health care for the tax they pay. Its on a matter of "taxes bad grr!" but what do you get for your taxes?  And, keep those fcuking GOP in office, and you'll keep getting fcuked. How do you like that Little Mr. Tax Rebel?
He is the host on the new series.
How many are in a brazillion??
Just posting to say that I love you counterspammer.
I wanted to skip this one because I am the biggest son of bitch in the world. You don't think I know what's going on in the Congo? It's like passing a homeless person and looking the other way. That's why this thread is here and the canned cheeseburger thread is number 1. No one cares for no one else except themselves. Like my cousin used to say when I tried to bring up something productive during our bake sessions. "**Dude, stop harshing my buzz!**" Word.   
This is true... however, I am sometimes in range of two networks and want to be connected to only one.
Or you could do what I do - use rsync for large files/directories.
The launch of Devil May Cry 4 is coming closer. Expectations are very high. It should easily surpass the success of the previous version.
Wow double post on reddit. Ok. I'll double comment...read his fatwa:  &gt;5-Destruction of the oil industries. The presence of the USA Crusader military forces on land, sea and air of the states of the Islamic Gulf is the greatest danger threatening the largest oil reserve in the world. The existence of these forces in the area will provoke the people of the country and induces aggression on their religion, feelings and prides and push them to take up armed struggle against the invaders occupying the land; therefore spread of the fighting in the region will expose the oil wealth to the danger of being burned up. The economic interests of the States of the Gulf and the land of the two Holy Places will be damaged and even a greater damage will be caused to the economy of the world. I would like here to alert my brothers, the Mujahideen, the sons of the nation, to protect this (oil) wealth and not to include it in the battle as it is a great Islamic wealth and a large economical power essential for the soon to be established Islamic state, by Allah's Permission and Grace. We also warn the aggressors, the USA, against burning this Islamic wealth (a crime which they may commit in order to prevent it, at the end of the war, from falling in the hands of its legitimate owners and to cause economic damages to the competitors of the USA in Europe or the Far East, particularly Japan which is the major consumer of the oil of the region).  [Bin Laden's Fatwa 1996](http://www.pbs.org/newshour/terrorism/international/fatwa_1996.html)
Are you really throwing STAR WARS quotes into this?  Now I *know* you're stupid. You started nothing.  Go back to the tippy-top of this thread.... you tried to claim, to someone *else*, that I was not intelligent.  *I* confronted *you*.  That means *I* started our discourse. You fail again.  Also, your tiresome repetition of the word "bitch" indicates a lack of imagination - yup, you fail there, too. Dance more for me, clown!
Thats really your premise. You said that by electing him president he will accomplish more. However the president doesn't create laws (except maybe signing statements, which is really an abuse). The only power he wields is the veto and running the government departments. So all the sweeping measures you expect Obama to make, won't happen unless the Congress enacts it for him.   As you said, he didn't have unlimited power as a Senator and I'm stating that he won't get unlimited power as president. He'll still be regular old Obama, the compromiser. Yet as president he will have to hope the Democrats accept and push forward his ideas. Yet when he was a mere Senator, they didn't listen to any grand idea, what makes you think any sweeping changes will come about just because he changes offices?  The thing about Paul however was that he was going to make changes at the departmental level. Those are the places that the president has direct control over. Obama hasn't suggested any changes in departmental policy though. He just gives visions.
Next he will be butt fuckin murdoch himself.
Not bold enough.  #**FAIL**  That's how you do it.
9/11 truth may have brought down Rudy.  Now 9/11 truth activists are electrified about an explosive new book by a NY Times best selling author, "The Shell Game" by Steve Alten. Learn what corporate media has censored from you about Rudy's demise.
Clearly they were Dire Bears.
i think the one made this year is the best but there will be better for sure.
I love the grenade. That is a great commercial.
Actually... now that I think about it, I tend to drive as if all cyclists run stop signs.  Not because they do, but rather because SOME of them do it sometimes.  All it takes is one!
this one's on the side... the action's usually in front... or so I thought....
very hott
As a person from Mississippi, I want to say two things.   1) The drivers licenses haven't looked like that in many years.  2) I'm sorry 
You need a drool cup if you think you're the king of reddit.
If just one in 12 of us know this, then the juror can inform the rest of the jury about this important right. One can agree with drug laws but still recognize an injustice to an individual case. This is something we all need to recognize. I for one would never mention nullification, just keep it under wraps incase the issue is needed. We need laws and we need to convict criminals, however we also must use EVERYTHING in our power to stop an injustice and this is the last defense in the legal arena for us to do so.
It's everybody's to say!
C'mon people!  20%?  Where's that American "can do" spirit I know and love?
YES!  Too bad Clinton spent some 10x as much as Obama in California.  Obama is concentrating his ads in the bible-belt.
Yeah, like he hasn't already.   Murdock and Rove have been stickin it in each others asses since 1999.
No, but it'd be pretty sweet if there were a Linux distro with DX10 and Steam support.
Fifteen identical comments on one story is the wrong way to go about it. One comment should be is sufficient, just catch them while they're on the new page.
everybody has accounted for it and therefore it's redundant to ever write this in any form  &gt;Anecdotal evidence does not an argument make.  He is offering supporting evidence of that argument. 
Black holes are not dump trucks.  They are more like a series of tubes.
So your whole point was that the word legalize and decriminalize occupy different pages in the dictionary? Big deal, that's smoke and mirrors, because they mean the same thing for the person on the street.
I think the post to which you are replying, and other people in the thread, are referring to people who continue to **ride** their bike while acting like a pedestrian.  A lot of bicyclists get in accidents riding through crosswalsk, for example.  Cars watch out for pedestrians when they're about to make a turn, but bikes approach the crosswalk too quickly for them to see.  It is for this and similar reasons that bikes may not be ridden on sidewalks or through crosswalks.  I think that's the effect people are referring to.  A bicyclist who is actually walking poses no special problems.  It's the bicyclists who is in pedestrian areas moving extremely quickly.  All people who enter the street should be very careful.  I try to make sure I can see the drivers' eyes before I enter a position where they must yield for me (such as entering a crosswalk with a walk light while they are making a right turn).
I was responding to Cynos.  Israel is a Jewish state. The policies of systematic terror by settlers against native people back up by police and military force are anchored by a religious claim to ownership of the land. 
For example, I wanted to submit an article about OCaml, but I think it would be nice to also have it listed on the Programming subreddit as well as the Ocaml subreddit.
Thats not Osama! It's simply George with a little make up and a turban - thats all.
A drop?  Yes.  But I'm not sure how your ratings can "tank" and still be #1.
Nah Napolean's men thought it was safe.
Exactly.
Ha, Classic. Their global carbon tax strategy fails so they change tactics and implements it on their own people first.
&gt; In the U.S. politicians can afford to upset a state or two, as long as they don't upset the important states. They just need to win that 51% (or even less, Clinton and Bush both got less than 50% their first term)  wtf?  they need to win a certain number of electoral votes.  the percentage is irrelevant.  also, if by "politicians", you mean presidential "candiates", then you are correct.  you didn't provide any evidence that that is true for other politicians. &gt; The reason I support Ron Paul is because he is federalist. I believe the people of each state would be better off if they governed themselves.  i'm not insulting you, i'm genuinely curious:  does this mean you support ron paul's ideas of basically getting out of the UN?  and if you lived in switzerland or norway, would you want to leave the EU and ron paul would suggest (which, by the way, those countries are not doing)?  edit: &gt; Government can be great, but it has to be small and local. Norway has less than 5 million people. If you look at Europe, the small countries in general do better. Switzerland is a federation.  huh?  what about the economic successes of germany, france, and england, the biggest countries in the eu.  (and yes i know norway has a higher per capita gdp than those countries, but that's the norwegian exception).
More importantly, why do you care?
No, because I've actually watched Fox news.  It's not hard to tell that they aren't very good.  Grow a brain and see for YOURSELF.
I liked the monk one the best. Monk! heck yes.
I'll wait for the ratings after next tuesday.
At my local Wal-Mart, I've observed that the only time they ask to check a receipt is if an item you are leaving with is not in a bag. I think this is reasonable... Especially considering that the area that I live in is highly populated with poor people.
&gt; religion is crazy. Damn right.
&gt;You started nothing. Go back to the tippy-top of this thread.... you tried to claim, to someone else, that I was not intelligent. I confronted you. That means I started our discourse.  Yes, please do go back. Please tell me WHO replied to WHO?  Waiting...  Waiting...  Waiting...  I replied to numerous comments of yours (as well as other people), calling you an idiot.  You are sadly mistaken, it was **I who confronted you**. I started this discourse, clown. I will decide when it ends. You are my little bitch.   Edit: Also humorous that you submitted a story about STAR WARS tattoos, yet call me out for quoting that movie. Hypocrite? Check.
I'm not sure I understand the question, in two ways.  First, I'm geuinly not sure I understand the question, are you asking me to explain the teachings of the Buddha as it pertains to the suffering of others?  Or are you challenging me in my beliefs?  If it's the later, I'm not a full on Buddhist. I've studied Buddhism and can honestly say I aspire to its teachings, but I'm not a monk, and am no great authority.  If it's the former:  The Four Noble Truths[1] are half the equation, the other half is the Eightfold Path. Basically in the first three noble truths, the Buddha says "Life is going to be filled with things that will bring you down, cause you grief. There's no getting around that, it's just part of being human. But you don't have to let it consume you, there's a way to not have it hurt so much. That way is learning to be clear of the clenching, grasping, wanting- which is the cause of the hardship that goes along with life."  And then he says, "Now, getting rid of that clenching is very hard- here are the steps to do it."  That's the Eight Fold Path.  And the eightfold path is about helping us to see things clearly, as they really are. That's hard because we cling to our beliefs very strongly. Sometimes things aren't as bad as we see them in our minds. Racists see every person of another color as something bad- they can't just see them as a person.  Sometimes things are worse than they appear. There are people in denial about their marriage, thinking everything's fine when it's not.  So the eightfold path helps clear those wrong perceptions away- and what naturally arises (and I say this both from the teaching and my own limited experience) is compassion.  You become a more compassionate person, able to empathize with others suffering.  But you also learn to be detached from the suffering itself. So you can love someone, love your child, but not be destroyed by the pain.  You can't eliminate the negative parts of life. Physical pain will happen. Sickness will happen. Death will happen. The death of those we care about will happen. Those things are inevitabilities.  Buddhism is about being able to see those things- to stare them in the face and come to an understanding with them. It doesn't mean you ignore them, nor have you conquered them. They are, and you are.  I'm sorry if I'm not explaining it well. This is not Tom Cruise stuff. Buddhism won't give you supernatural powers or let you control disease, or read minds or any of that. What it does is provide a framework for thinking which helps minimize your own suffering, and by extension the suffering of those around you.  And beyond, if you have any other questions, feel free to email me at emacsen at emacsen dot net   [1] And of course we're dealing with translation issues here in both the words "Noble" and "Truths".
Try EasyGoesIt....
Obama will save us....right?
Romney *was* being given answers from someone. "(Reagan) raised taxes, I'm not gonna" is clearly audible on high volume.  http://andrewsullivan.theatlantic.com/the_daily_dish/2008/01/romney-whispe-1.html?
That'd definitely work, but this -- paradoxically, given that biking is exercise -- is about doing as little work as possible to get everything loaded and hit the trails. Throwing on a rack has always taken me quite awhile.
get off my lawn ?
Eastern Canada: Obama
Track this back, and you'll find Guido quoted as saying "My personal favorite and I expect that will remain personal favorite for a long time is something named Django."
I know of at least one person who had to let it "grow out". Took at least a week...
WOW!!!  Somebody posted something crazy on the internets!  Oh hell, the honeymoon is over.  What's next, porn?
Downvoted for anti-religious discrimination.
Great site to Download Over Her Dead Body!  Got to Get it!
&gt; Because you don't mix commas and parentheses  I can see that one of those patterns has commas mixed with parens in it. :)  I was asking why it was preferable to avoid them.  Personally, I think it's easier to separate the arguments in the latter pattern.  &gt; instead of the first element arbitrarily separated from the rest.  The first element in (foo ...) is in a special place, too.  Whether the function call location is before or after the first paren seems arbitrary, to me.   
&gt;I'd agree, but where is the progressive political party [that effectively replaces/changed current parties]?  Obviously, the free market should provide one.  (And if you disagree perhaps the free market isn't all it's cracked up to be.)
&gt; you need to go onto the sidewalk  This part mostly works perfect.  &gt; get off your bike and walk along side.  Seen that about a dozen times only. Not counting people cutting the sidwalk to get to their houses. Those often don't even have both feet on the treats(?).  Other than that, I fully agree :)
griefing is slang for fucking with others, old man.
I'm not sorry to say this: GO FUCK YOURSELF!
Ah, classic Aerik. Start out pointed in the right direction, and keep going until you reach an astonishing collection of nonsense.   Okay, oh, great crusader against the evils of unconventional sex, riddle me this:  I became sexually active at the age of 13, with a 17 year old. (Might have been 16, don't quite remember.) Since by your definition, we were children (because 18 is some sort of biological milestone, instead of an arbitrary legal boundary), and, as you say, sex with a child is *always* rape, tell me:  Who raped who? Are we both rapists? And what would that even *mean*?
Well, it was a revolutionary prospect the first time around.  Why not now, too?
That's why the guy carries the title "manager"   As a manager you listen to what customers have to say, then respond.   The fact that the manager rudely interrupted the guy mid-sentence then calling him a freak is unforgivable.   I hope he gets canned for that. There are NO excuses that the manager can come up with where i would say, well okay, i can understand.   None whatsoever.  This isn't a bash on apple.   Steve jobs has no control on who works as manager on a store level, but if that guy isn't terminated for what he did, it does show company policy against those who don't treat their loyal customers the way they'd like to be treated.  apple relies on brand/customer loyalty to thrive in the competitive pc market. and this story (if true) is a serious black eye  It completely changes my view on the company. Keep in mind he didn't just get mistreated by the manager, the tech did as well.
Why does McCain look like a beached baby seal?  
Don't you know that even when it is videotaped and you can see it with your own eyes, if you believe it exists you're a whackjob.
If you're making fun of the terms they both use, how is it not sarcasm?
Pound-me-in-the-ass prison?
Let's see, in one month Obama supporters raised $32 million, that's over $1 million/day. It took paul supporters three months to raise $20 million.  So the two paul moneybombs averaged $5 million each. Every day for a month, Obama got 1/5th of a Paul moneybomb.
OK. Its settled, America will vote for Obama because a washed up celebrity endorses him.  I always wondered why people cared when a famous person, who has nothing to do with politics, endorses a candidate.  I mean, I can understand Chuck Norris, but Hulk Hogan?  He doesn't even have a grill named after him.
Huh. Connection?  &gt;intelligently holds the values and ideals of a social liberal or secular progressive  and  &gt;believe that Hillary is anything other than a self-serving, conniving, triangulating, lying, *?   I... don't think that belief in any policy platform translates into a level of skill regarding character judgment.   Moreover, I think one has to be paying fairly close attention to the race to deduce any "conniving, triangulating, lying". My guess is that most people aren't paying anywhere near that amount of attention to the candidates themselves.  I would have said that "self-serving" fits into the above category too, but I think there's enough "anti-feminist" (for lack of a better term) sentiment in both sexes for that to be a conclusion reached purely on the basis of Hillary running at all. 
I wonder how they came up with $4,713,823,000, and why they didn't tack on another twenty three cents.
i got up to 4 and then it did the same thing as yours within 3 hours time 
&gt; I wrote "If you are saying that I argued for a causal relationship when there is none, why didn't you just say so? OK, I'll bite. Where exactly did I do this?" and you responded "Shit . . . I don't even remember any longer."  Oh, that.  I guess you could say I was "unable to respond" there, in the sense of "It has been many, many posts since that, and I had other things on my mind.  This slipped my mind.  Sorry."  It's not an indication I'm dishonest or stupid, however, as you imply.  &gt; Assuming this metaphor is apt, why would it be so damn hard for you to say "Pain is not a color"?  It's not difficult.  The actual discussion at hand is a little more complex, though, so I'm willing to entertain the notion that you might have some kind of argument to back up your assertion, rather than just telling you you're an idiot.  &gt; Your stand, that I am trying to convince you and if I can you will have learned something. . .that is greedy.  Your use of the word "greedy" here to pretend I'm a bad person, and thus you're right, is asinine, reprehensible, and other things I don't wish to say in public right now.  &gt; What do I get out of it? It is only fair that you should give me the same opportunity to be convinced of something.  I don't know what you get out of it.  That's for you to determine.  If you want to get something out of it, ask for something.  If I find my (potential) benefit to be worth more to me than the cost of giving you what you want, I'll give it.  If not, I won't.  You have the same opportunities.  . . . and your "What's in it for me?" sounds kinda "greedy".  &gt; BTW, "I know more than you on x subject" is a logical fallicy. I don't care which fallicy you want to atribute it to.  I'm not sure you know what constitutes a logical fallacy (completely aside from your inability to spell it).  Something is only a logical fallacy if it is used as part of a logical argument, but is not logically valid.  Something said outside of any logical arguments is not a logical fallacy -- it's a tangent, or otherwise irrelevant to the argument itself.  I didn't attribute it to a fallacy at all.  Note the difference between what I said it wasn't (an ad hominem fallacy) and what I said it was (possibly an ad hominem "attack", if I meant it maliciously -- which I didn't).  See how one of them is identified as a fallacy and the other is not?  I'll try to make this clearer.  Randomly telling someone on the street "You're a dick!" isn't an ad hominem fallacy.  Telling someone in a debate "You're a dick -- therefore you're wrong!" *is* an ad hominem fallacy.  See how that works?  &gt; you admit you have no interest in returning the favor in kind  I'm not in the habit of going around telling me all my opinions on all subjects just because they're there.  If you give me sufficient reason to tell you my opinion on something I will.  You *still* haven't asked for any specific opinion, though.  &gt; The problem with any tax is that it changes people's behavior.  True, from a strict economics-engineering perspective.  There are other problems, from other perspectives.  &gt; A tax on savings will encourage people to spend money instead; likewise, a tax on spending will encourage people to save. Thus, it is a safe assumption that under a sales tax, people with the capacity to save will do so.  Probably true.  You make a good point.  This would seem to indicate that, if you want to encourage increasing velocity of capital, sales tax is a bad idea.  &gt; One simply cannot have wealth if they use all their income on consumption.  That depends on what you mean by "consumption".  If you spend some of that income on stuff that you can keep, and that retains value, you have only traded one form of wealth for another.  If you spend it on things that don't retain value, you lose wealth.  Do you specifically mean "only those things that have no value after purchase" when you say "consumption"?  Are you, perhaps, saying that spending all of one's income just to make sure that you only eat the most expensive foods (all else being equal) would reduce one's wealth?  If so, you're right.  If you're just saying that spending money always necessarily reduces wealth, you're wrong.  I'm not entirely sure what your assumed meaning for "consumption" is, in this case.
Guess where Hillary Clinton and John McCain come in?  You might be surprised (about Ron Paul, too).
You have kind of hijacked this though ;)
no doubt. This title is redundant. Hasnt he done 100's of things that are grounds for impeachment?  Either do it! or change the fucking record will you. 
I'm sorry, but it's annoying as fuck when religious people trot out this argument. "You have to treat all religious people the same or you're being a hypocrite!" Well, when fundamentalist Buddhists infiltrate our government and start wars claiming the blessings of Buddha, then we'll mock their beliefs too.  What's really incredible here is your reaction isn't, "Holy shit, I actually take these stories literally and base my morality on them? What the fuck is wrong with me?", it's "OMG THE ATHIESTS ARE MEANIES."
You got that right!!!
Obama is the only candidate who doesn't talk like he's a millions years old.  He's the non-boomer of the group, which in my mind gains him an extra karma point or two.
&gt; For all intents and purposes, he's done.  That's a real strong argument you make there. Are you from Fox News?
&gt; If you want a BSD-like experience, you can get close with Slackware Linux. Or Gentoo. Or Arch.
What kind of stoner-sophistry is this?
Gosh, there's no end to these stories, but the public reaction to this article is worth reading - Finger pointing the "Ken Lays" and "Enrons" like Riverside county were Houston, pie-in-the-sky American (day-)dream, and others
Seems like they forgot the CIA up top.
Suprised nobody else commented, but the "Waiwai" section is not in-house news, but rather translations of interesting articles from the weekly magazines.  It's got about the same credibility as an article from Maxim or Cosmo that's been deliberately mistranslated to increase the number of double entendres.  Normally pretty good reading, but shouldn't be taken too seriously.
This is blatantly fallacious reasoning. 1. Something is happening.  2. Osama bin Laden wants this something to happen.  3. Therefore, the something that is happening is bad. Is everyone else completely blind to this?
Ya, screw the laws, let's go big. LIKE HITLER BIG.  Fuckin deuchebag.
Still my bitch.
The Abyss? I loved that movie!
Not to be a hater or anything, but this would have been so much better if they showed Ron Paul as Neo in the scene where he's giving Trinity the HBI.   
This isn't about pro or anti cop. It's about some people using their positions in society to commit acts of evil.  I think we can agree that the rhetoric on both sides is just clouding the issue.  However with that said I find it very difficult to sympathize with your side of things. I find my sympathies much more on the side of the victims of police criminality.  Probably the difference between us is you think this is just a rare incident getting exposed. I see it as a common incident getting rare exposure.
I was just scratching my ear!
Barack Obama certainly speaks nothing but platitudes when he's in public, [but this video interview with the San Francisco Chronicle](http://election08.videosift.com/talk/Chicago-Trib-and-SF-Chronicle-Endorse-Obama) showed me that he's actually a very deep thinking, insightful man.
This is OLD news, 2500 years to be specific. Can we have the taser news back already?
"...as well as large families who must use bigger vehicles to travel."  Since when does having a big family necessitate  driving a tank?  When I was growing up, my uncle had six kids and a Pinto!  Besides, I seem to remember large families doing just fine before SUVs got popular - it was called a minivan.  Oh, that's right, minivans aren't "cool."  Well, neither is the f-ing planet anymore, so suck it up!
You don't know who he is?  He's the juggernaut bitchhhhhhhhhhhh!
he's got the right idea but the wrong target.  depopulation should start at home.  let's do Bush voters first.
Reddit is censoring me... It's pissing me off... Look at my submissions, I've been trying to submit a link to the damn enhanced version of the Romney whisper. My shit never shows up on the new page. Does everyone already know the full audible whisper was "...(Reagan) raised taxes, I'm not gonna...", pretty much ruling out a prompt for Russert and explaining MSNBC's bizarre original denial? Their first explanation was that Mitt's mic had temporarily malfunctioned, which might have been the case, but it sure as hell wasn't Mitt talking.  http://andrewsullivan.theatlantic.com/the_daily_dish/2008/01/romney-whispe-1.html?
Why do you have to hit everything with a stick.
That is why I just keep mine at 0, much less hassle.
That Peel P50, I can promise emits vastly more particulate pollution than any Lexus.  Perhaps not volume of CO, but by measure of "pollution" is a far bigger monster.
I guess that's one way to look at it.  So, do you think this definition of the word is incorrect? * *knowledge or a system of knowledge covering general truths or the operation of general laws, especially as obtained and tested through scientific method*
Really, I think everyone who owns a gun (44 million +) could handle whatever came our way. FORT U.S.A! Fuck Yeah!
The pundits can suck certain things belonging to me and/or other people...
Heh. I'd actually prefer comments to be much more link-rich.   I suppose it doesn't help that comment karma "doesn't count". 
I guess I'm not seeing how about 24 inches matters much in this case. The dakota (1996 -2004) has an overall length of 196 inches, and  a new imprezza's length is 173 inches. I mean thats less than an arm length, 
Yes, I'm joking about a tragedy, but really, who doesn't know that murdering people will fuck you up?
I still trust Obama more than Clinton. Does that answer suit you? I'm so sick of these snooty responses on reddit.  Fuck off. 
I think the point of the article was to say "I'm sorry I disrespected the rules of the road back there, but I'm going to continue doing so without regard for your safety or mine. Have a nice day!"
what domestic spending?  The only current domestic spending is giving the American public their own money back so they can spend it on foreign crap.
So true. I always hesitate when wishing people "peace". Absolute "peace", after all, is death.  Distinctions between types of "suffering" need to be made here. There is useful suffering and there is unnecessary suffering.  Often, and unfortunately, it seems, people get into spirituality in search of a "flatline" as you say.
Like the government and the pharmaceutical industry!
Couldn't have said any better.
Berkeley is so radical, I liked living there.
Fake picture is fake.
&gt; No, it's not "assume p".  That depends on what the definition of "is" is.
&gt; how about 24 inches matters   Have you ever lived in a city?  2 feet is the difference between a parking space, and being out of luck.
yeah... i also liked the one with the monk. awesome!
&gt; Finally! Through all this empty rhetoric, you admit that "the tendency" is that "the poor spend a larger percentage of their income than the rich." Therefore, we can say that the sales tax tends to be regressive. I know that is slightly different than saying the sales tax is regressive, but I can live with it.  Good!  I'm glad we agree.  &gt; So let me get this straight: If you say I'm not listening to you and not making any points, that is logical.  No, it's an observation -- and I've made some comments about how that's true, rather than just stating it without additional detail.  &gt; But if I say you're not listening to me and not making any points, that is not logical?  If you made even a half-assed case for it, it might be relevant -- but saying the equivalent of "I know you are, but what am I?" doesn't prove anything.
Please find me the Jefferson quote that supports the idea that we should slay police executing a warrant.
No, I'm on my chair.   I think you might have the internet on *you* though.  It's kinda dirty, the internet, you should probably wash it off.   PS I actually did look it up on wikipedia, but was too lazy to read the article.  I was hoping someone would just summarize. haha yeah I know I'm lazy.
they are subreddits, not tags.  If reddit develops a tagging system I could see them doing this, but as is, I wouldn't hold your breath.
Tons.
Here's the STFU you ordered...
"McLovin? What are you trying to be an Irish R&amp;B singer?"
That is for those of us that care, I care. Some don't care and just want out of jury duty, these people can still be useful to the cause by using jury nullification to get out of it, when enough people do this(it's the easiest way to get out of jury duty), they won't be able to ignore it. Just like the courts have gotten used to all the other excuses(it's almost impossible to use a financial hardship excuse for example), this is one excuse they cannot accomodate, since jury nullification is a right. Eventually they will have to throw their hands up in the air and give in since if they refused everyone who talked about jury nullification, they couldn't find any jurors.
A police raid yesterday on Cape Cod recovered stolen World War II medals, along with a trailer full of power tools and collectibles — all found in the home of a man nicknamed "Joe Bag O' Doughnuts."
We need to crack down on the paultards and obamaspam
You have just murdered the English language.  Please turn yourself in before anybody else get hurt.
OMG INTERNET TOUGH GUY, RUN PM me your address, big man
[Here's why.](http://psychology.suite101.com/article.cfm/so_you_think_youre_funny)  &gt;Telling funny jokes can reveal important opinions or feelings about hot topics like marriage, love, death, or even abortion – and give you the opportunity to back off with an innocent, "Just kidding! Had you worried for a minute there, didn't I?"  Plus a few other things there.
Unicorns are mentioned four times in the bible.
Using chemical batteries for electric cars is a thing of the past. Superconducting Magnetic Energy Storage System (SMES) is a device for storing electrical energy in magnetic fields. It stores and releases a lot of energy rapidly. It acts like a capacitor.
The conservatives and fascists are gonna wake up one day and figure out that there is no money to pay for all their wars and corporate wellfare.
You couldn't make a lamb your "bitch." You're a useless, woman-hating, uncreative,  incompetent, petty little troll. Interesting to see you're trying to pull this crap in *two* threads now!  What little benefit of doubt I was barely giving you regarding your supposed intelligence is all but gone, fool.  Please, keep amusing me.  Dance, clown, dance!
Step 1) Save 96% of your huge oil revenue  Step 2) ??????  Step 3) Propsit
My Mom told me, "between you and me, I like him a lot, and I hope he gets elected, but I just couldn't vote for him."  "Why not??" I asked. "He's just too liberal." &gt;.&lt;
great article
I don't know. :(
You mentioned race three times and opened both paragraphs with it, it should not be an issue. Bush is a Republican, this is reality here. Your statement on policy is biased, wrong, and absurd. 
Your right your idea is better!!
wow, you win all the reddit points, Im gonna start arguing with religious people for no reason too, so I can win all the points
They forgot that [Ayman al-Zawahiri](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Ayman_al-Zawahiri) is the number two guy (number one if, in fact, Bin Laden's dead).
I don't know why you're downvoted here, after all, you *would* be the expert.
Suicides are up, deserters are up, psychological problems are through the roof, enlistment is down, and troop numbers are matched by private mercenaries because there aren't enough soldiers to support the war.  But hey, the soldiers want to be in Iraq. They think they are doing the right thing. At least that's what I keep being told by guys in suits on television.
Breakups can be nasty and bad for the ego, especially if you've been dumped by a gorgeous hunk. Your pride will not allow you to take the drastic steps to snatch him away from another woman's arms. If there's someone who has shown you some passing interest, follow this up without going overboard. You'll need the subtle arts of seduction for this highly explosive and secret mission.
It just gets you excitement faster, but taking your time about it gives the best orgasms I find. Hold it off for an hour or so, and when you finally get there... Much better.
The only way to get around at speed in London is on a motorcycle/scooter.
What's the point of a lunch ride if not work?
It's about as relevant as libertarianism, but you can be sure such a discussion would turn into nothing but a debate over Ron Paul. I'd be more than willing to engage you in a debate over the points you raise, but this is not the place to do it.
Only 10?
velkommen das redditopia thats how things roll srry :(
Probably because I initially wrote something like 'you're clearly biased' and changed it to '**you're** post **clearly** shows that you are **biased**,' without changing the 'you're'.  Thank you for pointing that out, but some how I don't imagine you go through reddit and point out every spelling error in every comment.
I was disproving his point by counter-example.
good luck strapping enough cores together to simulate a non-deterministic TM
No, it was the CRA, while this website is a bit more critical of the government then I about the CRA, it covers the topic well http://www.lewrockwell.com/dilorenzo/dilorenzo125.html  I don't think the crisis was so much caused by it, but it seems clear that subprime was promoted by the government, and some idiots thought it was a great idea and pushed it further then they should have.
&gt; Israel's reaction is hard to defend&amp;hellip;, but I can't see how Hezbollah's can be defended at all. Yes, Hezbollah's action was terrorism, but terrorism is a weapon of the weak. Going toe-to-toe with the Israeli armed forces in a conventional battle would have been suicide. I am not saying that it was ethical of them to use terrorism, but when that is the only option left to a people, one should not be surprised if they use it. Remember, [the Jewish people themselves used terrorism in the founding of their country](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/King_David_Hotel_bombing), back when they were the weak ones. I am reminded of the movie *The Battle of Algiers*:  &gt; **Journalist:** M. Ben M'Hidi, don't you think it's a bit cowardly to use women's baskets and handbags to carry explosive devices that kill so many innocent people?  &gt;  &gt; **Ben M'Hidi:** And doesn't it seem to you even more cowardly to drop napalm bombs on defenseless villages, so that there are a thousand times more innocent victims? Of course, if we had your airplanes it would be a lot easier for us. Give us your bombers, and you can have our baskets.
Yea, but the Hulk is [A Real American!](http://youtube.com/watch?v=GGuhZvO1DKg&amp;feature=related)
Why are people doing this now? Use the fucking submission page idiot. Down you go.
*swift dash* Sir! Your papers please. -Sorry, I don't do that! But... it's against the rules.. without rules, we will all be up a tree flinging poo at each other.. is that what you want?
I would think that the greater issue would be people parking with too much room around them than some guy in a small truck. I'll agree with you when it comes to large trucks and suvs, but a small truck is the same size as an average car.
http://reddit.com/info/679c2/comments/  Thanks for adding a question mark to the url in order to resubmit the link two hours later.
i mean really, what else do you need to know?  i just can't understand "liberals" that support hillary... and i'm not even a clinton bigot.  why don't you just register republican?
Where does the "step 4: ???, step 5: profit" meme come from?
Hey, you're entitled to your opinion. Not saying you aren't. I only addressed the issue at hand. How could Ron Paul halt U.S. involvement in Iraq and that solution is pretty clear. Order the troops out, no trade barriers and let the Iraqis contract out US businesses to fix things.  The efficacy of that approach is a different conversation.
"On Monday he warned against the "seductive" powers of science, saying it was important that science did not become the sole criteria for goodness."  Straw mania.  Since when is science a criteria for itself?  That's religion's job.  What a confused fuckhead.  Good things he has that title.  Otherwise who would listen to his crazy ass?
* *You are sadly mistaken, it was I who confronted you.* You fuckwit.  Now you really *are* proving yourself to be an idiot.  [Here's the link](http://reddit.com/info/675hf/comments/c031mmi). I submitted the tattoo story because I thought the people who received them were idiots. ---  Keep dancing for me, fool.  Only a true imbecile could keep going as you are, proving that you are, indeed, truly an imbecile.
and the winner is.....OSAMA!  somebody photoshop him in a party hat.  I'm too lazy, but I feel it'd be worth it.  especially if it were in the style of those motivational posters.
A wagon train of settlers gets in a skirmish with some indians. One of the settlers is shot through the chest with an arrow. His family gets him to a doctor. The doctor asks the man if it hurts. The settler replies, "Only when I laugh."
I wonder if our submitter managed to type "peer-reviewed creationist science journal" without laughing out loud at the sheer absurdity of such a thing... I'm guessing probably not.
my firefox crashes all the time on gutsy. mainly when there is flash. anyone know how to fix this?
http://archive.newsmax.com/archives/ic/2005/11/29/100012.shtml Did a quick google on that - and came across this interesting piece, where McCain admitted to providing false information to his captors under torture, and they use that to say that torture works.  Are they that stupid?!
This is stupid. America has been being bankrupted for decades now, and it's not the fault of 'terrorists'.  It's just now the signs of this bankruptcy are reaching the populace so a scapegoat is needed.  It is pathetic how easily these people are conned. 
haha
Respect for all cultures, no matter how fucked up and backwards they are.
Maybe you should blogspam your site on reddit some more. Boy are we going to have fun with your email address.  You are definitely going to be my little bitch now.  Edit: and by the way, that link was from a comment AFTER I replied to your comments numerous times calling you an idiot, just look at the time stamps. Just bc you chose to respond to that comment, rather than the ones where I directly confronted you, does not mean you started this first, but nice try, fuckwit.
and somehow this constitutes "fascism."
That part bothers me about Ron Paul as well.
The problem with your interpretation (and the test itself, on this question) is that it's inconsistent with other questions in the quiz.  It does not say something of the form "A presently has property B", it says "water *is*...", with no equivocation, just as definitely as the first question says "All ducks quack".  "All ducks quack" is not an inductive definition that means "all ducks we've seen so far quack" - if it were, then the answer to the first question would be "invalid" rather than "valid": Donald might happen to be the first duck we've encountered that doesn't quack.  Similarly, "water *is* X" cannot merely mean that all water we've seen so far is X.  Premise B and the conclusion seem to imply such an interpretation of premise A, but they do not have the power to modify premise A.  The only thing that can modify premise A is a direct modification of premise A.  You suggest a criterion for an implicit modification of premise A:  &gt; Once you are given a problem with multiple time periods, you then have to include time in your deduction.  This doesn't apply in this case, for the reason I've already given.  There is no temporal qualifier in premise A, and inductive cases would be a problem for most of the other questions also.  The potential for inductive cases does not need to be explicitly stated: for all those questions and their answers to be valid, the premises which say things like "all", "are", and "is" have to be absolute, just as it does in question 15.  It is not valid to assume that because time is introduced elsewhere, that premise A's definitiveness is thereby compromised.  &gt; In this case, "Water is" must be applied as a rule in the present tense, not as an inherent rule across all time.  There's no such rule in logic, and this is not a logical issue.  To determine the answer to question 15, all we need is premise A and your correct rule that "all that matters in logic is the abstract symbols".  In the conclusion, the term "this molecule" clearly refers to the molecule described in premise A, so we can substitute premise A into the conclusion, giving:  &gt; "Therefore we can predict that every future examination of a molecule composed of two hydrogen atoms and one oxygen atom will reveal the same chemical composition [of a molecule composed of two hydrogen atoms and one oxygen atom]".  This is tautological.  We can indeed predict this, although "predict" is unnecessarily weak.  We know this by definition.  Premise B is a red herring, as is the appeal to induction.  It is beyond logical doubt that the logically correct answer to question 15 is "valid".  The test is incorrect on this point.  (Added: note that the given answer talks about "there may exist a substance...".  This commits the error of assuming that the "water" referred to in the question is a substance that has properties we can reason about outside of those given in the question.  But this again contradicts the way the other questions in the test are used; if we are supposed to do that, then we know that Paris is not in New Zealand, or that men do not "think only about sex".  We cannot use our external knowledge about the objects under discussion to falsify premises, and it is irrelevant in any case, because we are being told that the premises are true.  If a situation did arise in which "water" was found to have some other composition, it would make premise A false, which would invalidate the design of the question, in which we are told to assume the premises.)
Dear Reddit--  I'd like _two_ ponies.  Thanks,   Desrosiers.
Dick Cheney, anybody else with a stack in oil or arms companies? How about the people owning the upgraded prison networks?  Or what about the good folks in the private security sector?   Israel also got quite a lot of mileage out of the attack.
I was waiting for someeone to get flung/tossed accross the office  I'm sure they sold a few hundred thousand units   including one for the oval office  Imagine bush sitting on the chair saying nucelar
I wonder what the ratio of autistic/mac users to autistic/pc users is?  Sounds to me like he meant "freak" in a friendly way, but you can't really expect an autistic guy to understand that...  That's kind of the problem.
Bullshit.  This man is hurting you, and by not stopping him, you are feeding the beast. By allowing him to beat you, you allow him to beat others.  So no, you don't just take it.
My mom voted for Bush... twice.  I'll get right on that.
Reddit is censoring me... It's pissing me off... Look at my submissions, I've been trying to submit a link to the damn enhanced version of the "Romney Whisper". My shit never shows up on the new page. Does everyone already know the full audible whisper was "...(Reagan) raised taxes, I'm not gonna..."?   This pretty much rules out the Russert prompt theory and explains MSNBC's bizarre original denial. Their first explanation was that Mitt's mic had temporarily malfunctioned, which might have been the case, but it sure as hell wasn't Mitt talking. The full audible whisper reveals a complete answer to the question, an answer Romney happened to use.  http://andrewsullivan.theatlantic.com/the_daily_dish/2008/01/romney-whispe-1.html?
I don't know why this is being down voted.  I will lick my own feces if Obama ever becomes president in 2008.
They must have had a low capacity for pain.
The policy of intervention both at home and abroad is cut from the same immoral fabric. Liberals concede to the conservatives, demanding more corporate welfare and accepting more war. Conservatives demand more war, and pass big government measures at home to appease their counterparts. Both paths lead to bankruptcy.
Can you actually vote yourself?  I'm just curious.
Or perhaps they are just unable to get a sexual partner without paying for one.
&gt;Telling someone in a debate "You're a dick -- therefore you're wrong!" is an ad hominem fallacy Sounds very similar to ""If you know much about economics, it is not as big as you think."  Here, you are saying "you are ignorant about economics - therefore you're wrong." &gt;You still haven't asked for any specific opinion, though. I have, repeatively, asked you why you thought sales taxes weren't regressive.   
So that's [where](http://www.amazon.com/Where-Sidewalk-Ends-30th-Anniversary/dp/0060572345/).
This is what they want you to think.  "Well at least she didnt get tazered and killed"  That is the benchmark now, when you are assaulted and terrorized by the police you can count your blessings that it was only a bit of police brutality, think of it as a friendly warning to keep your head down a little lower citizen.
No shit, Sherlock
Come try and make us.
I think this will just reinforce the idea that many homeless people aren't really homeless and are just running a scam.
*CLANK*
BSDi was sued, you can't sue software.  Another nit-pick. The software had questionable legality at the time.
I'm not even American and I enjoyed that. The Sprint crime deterrant phone was genius. 
Reddit is censoring me... It's pissing me off... Look at my submissions, I've been trying to submit a link to the damn enhanced version of the Romney whisper. My shit never shows up on the new page. Does everyone already know the full audible whisper was "...(Reagan) raised taxes, I'm not gonna...". Just turn up the volume, it's there.   This pretty much rules out the Russert prompt theory and explains MSNBC's bizarre original denial. Their first explanation was that Mitt's mic had temporarily malfunctioned, which might have been the case, but it sure as hell wasn't Mitt talking. The full audible whisper reveals a complete answer to the question, an answer Romney happened to use.  http://andrewsullivan.theatlantic.com/the_daily_dish/2008/01/romney-whispe-1.html?
You just have to understand the system. Without these lockups, and the other 6,000,000 people incarcerated or on parol, the judges, attorneys, the guards and the prison owners and many others would all be out of a job. Now what could be worse than that! It would be an economic catastrophy. The hell with what ever the real problem is, WE NEED THE CASH TO FLOW!!
If Obama or Ron Paul doesn't win the election, we're just in for (at least) 4 more years of murder, constitutional rape, and spreading the U.S. brand of terrorism in the middle east.
This is not true.
I always find it interesting that Americans have the tendency to see any physical affection between males as having a homosexual context. Much of Europe seems so much warmer in this regard.
Crack cocaine helped him overcome his addiction to alcohol.
What if the other is a crossdresser?
'cause it considers god(s), and their (non-)existence, irrelevant.
Goddamn... how can people live with that? Shit if I lived there I think I would make a new anonymous drug house report every night.
Is that any different than it is now?  Or is that just because I'm a rich white kid? I'm serious.  I got caught a couple times.  Fines, shit from my university, but never "time".
Two problems:   First, 4 lives out of 400M? At what cost?  Lipitor earned Pfizer $1.7B in revenue in 2006 (Pfizer Annual Report).  Let's argue that the US share of that is only 25% with the remainder of sales from the rest of the world.  Ignoring that there are lots of other statins on the market that works out to a *minimum expenditure* of $105M per life saved out of the pockets of everyone who took Lipitor with no benefit.  That's a major opportunity cost paid for by people who will never benefit from the investment themselves.  Sounds like a waste to me.  Seconds, if only 4 lives are "saved" in the US per year and the original study "proving" this efficacy must necessarily be based on a test population far smaller than the size of the US (400M), just how accurate can the statistic actually be anyway - "4" is not statistically significant in any sense even assuming they tested statins on every US citizen to test efficacy.  It may be just as likely that the actual number of lives saved by statins is actually 2 or 1 or 0 simple due to measurement uncertainty.  If all they showed in clinical trails was that LDL or cholesterol drops (more likely), then the entire efficacy number is determined solely on the *unproven and known-to-be-uncorrelated link between LDL and raw cholesterol levels, and "heart disease"*. Note that most modern medicines have similar trivial (and vacuous) efficacy rates when represented in terms of "number of patients treated to single patient benefited".  That's why this metric for representing efficacy is seldom used - most drugs are for making money not for treating disease.  (oh yes, I used to work in biotech and have plenty of relatives that make a living directly or indirectly from pharma so I say this knowing whose ox is gored.)
Crap.  I bid $4,713,822,000.  Sniped at the last second yet again!  CURSE YOU AO-HELL!!!
He's the product of an unbalanced equation.
Something about life, liberty, and property comes to mind. You know, what the cop was trying to deny this guy.
I SEE WHAT YOU DID THERE!
hmmm not enough evidence for this. Plenty of crimes with damning evidence
Oh, I think I'll be making a bit more than that by the end of a half year or so =). Thanks for the encouragement though.  Situation, for clarification as to why I am so poor right now:  I live in Indiana. Not many tech gigs around here.  Not making enough cash flow at the moment to afford workshops, or new textbooks (although I do actively read and work through books, online and off to improve my skill - handy that I find that fun, I guess).   No workshops around here anyhow, and can't afford gas, bus tickets, time, etc to attend.  In my current apartment, I don't have reliable internet access. We've ordered from AT&amp;T, and they've been dicking us around for a few weeks now - so I'm either using the net via an open access point that I can barely see, and is thus flaky, or walking in the freezing cold to a coffee shop or a local bar that I know the people in and fix their various network / general computer problems from time to time.   I'm not tied to any language at all. I have done non-trivial work in a variety of languages, although lately it's been a bunch of small php fixes and some really interesting python work.   For personal work, I prefer to keep the languages used down to one or two. But having enough familiarity with a large variety of languages to be able to get things done (in a manner appropriate for the language) in a lot of languages has helped me a lot.  Frankly, with most of the "mainstream" languages there's not much of a paradigm shift going on anyhow when switching from one to the other, mostly just syntax and libraries.  I'm also working on the specs for an open-source website-as-service project that I think has some potential - _I_ would find it useful at least. I'm planning on implementing it in common lisp. I'm going to have to find a decent cheap host for lisp sites, or do some craziness to avoid bandwidth problems though. . . with any luck, I'll land some funding for it, or enough recognition to get a decent job offer. Got to get a proof-of-concept working first though.  But yeah, thanks again for the advice. I feel kind of weird talking about myself so much in a reddit thread.
that's not how it works. Mitt Romney will never be the president of the church of jesus christ of latter day saints.
This is very nice. It would be interesting to compare with the type inference relation from [Kanren](http://kanren.sourceforge.net).
Way too long.
speaking of "south of the border ethics", I love the $50 Mexica whores.  Viva la Tijuana!
hope i don't get cholera anytime soon  This is what reddit is all about good find
Hillary: Lowering the cost of health-care will improve the quality of health-care across the board. WTF? ::raises hand:: Uhm, explain please?! :)
I am not mormon, but i know this man was a good man. The world was better when he was part of it.
Why would the government help you out of your college debt?  Were you forced into it somehow?  BTW, there is no article.  Did you follow the link?  It links to this comment string.
Where are the Ron Paulites to tell us how Liberals are anti-freedom?
Ron who?....
How convenient. Now what catastrophy could cause marshal law?
Global warming no doubt.  And yes, I'm being sarcastic.
I stand corrected.
Damnit I was just going to say the exact same thing. Quotes and all!  Damn.. if we don't keep the truth from children how are we adults going to maintain the skillful web of lies that we use to prop up our own bullshit realities?
I love how you desperately always try to reinvent reality.  &gt;thinks that burning cars is worse than genocide  &gt;You keep spouting "I didn't MEAN that, I MEANT this"   Wow again you made up two other things that never happened. Maybe its a case of schizophrenia?  I love how you desperately always try to reinvent reality.  &gt;thinks that burning cars is worse than genocide  &gt;You keep spouting "I didn't MEAN that, I MEANT this"   Wow again you made up two other things that never happened by distorting the reality. Maybe its a case of schizophrenia?  My turn, let me analyze what you said in your previous posts.  First you keep claiming that all Jews should be exterminated and that Israelis civilians who get killed deserved it.  &gt;You know we wouldn't ever have to deal with being called anti-semitic if there were no more Jews... just sayin'  Then you said that genocide and war is the solution to world problems.  &gt;Depopulation should be the highest priority of the World.  You also, like your supremacist friends, hate black people has much has Jews.  &gt;It's okay to use the word 'nigger' any way you like  Then you proudly defend your right to be a pedophile and to lure underage girls to blow your cum on their face.  &gt;Because ejaculate does not actually cause any harm when applied to the skin. There was no damage done.  Then you continue your rant against black people.  &gt;it is okay to make fun of brown people  Wow! how can you live with yourself?
a cackler too
lol oh wait, not only do you not live in a real country, you don't even live within one of the better states of that country at least Quebecois have some balls fucking Calgary? what's your mascot, a milk cow?
Technically, it should be labeled:   | Sidewalk |  |   End |  And at the other end:   | Sidewalk |  |   Begin  |  However, I think this is better:   | &lt;/Sidewalk&gt; |  Eh?
Reddit is censoring me... It's pissing me off... Look at my submissions, I've been trying to submit a link to the damn enhanced version of the Romney whisper. My shit never shows up on the new page. Does everyone already know the full audible whisper was "...(Reagan) raised taxes, I'm not gonna...". This pretty much rules out the Russert prompt theory and explains MSNBC's bizarre original denial.   Their first explanation was that Mitt's mic had temporarily malfunctioned, which might have been the case, but it sure as hell wasn't Mitt talking. The full audible whisper reveals a complete answer to Russert's 'trick' question, an answer Romney happened to use.  http://andrewsullivan.theatlantic.com/the_daily_dish/2008/01/romney-whispe-1.html?
I'd be invisible.
That's 2 weeks gone by JUST LIKE THAT. I don't know whether I should begin to fear.
OutsourceIT2Philippines is a total BPO solution provider offers Web Design &amp; Development, Managed Outsourcing, E-commerce, Search Engine Optimization, Web Hosting, Domain Registration &amp; other quality outsource services-making IT affordable for you.
It would be interesting to see the same numbers for the United States.  Anyone have them?  I mean, I'm living over in China right now, and personally I can attest that very close to 0% of the population has ever smoked (I'm very lucky to get a connect here!)... in fact, most people don't even know what it is.  So that's 25% of the world population right there.   I bet the numbers for the States is higher.
I recommend everyone to see the film / documentary "no end in sight".  It predates the surge but is still relevant.  [http://imdb.com/title/tt0912593/](http://imdb.com/title/tt0912593/)
[Problem solved](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Real_Alternative).
Yeah, I used to like steak, too. Ate it every now and then, and with great pleasure - just like a lot of people. But eating it solely based on pleasure (not necessity) is sadistic.  In the US, all animals bred for human consumption - whether they are raised in factory farms or "humane" farms - are all transported to and slaughtered in USDA certified slaughterhouses like the ones in the video. These places aren't as regulated as you'd think. If you are interested in what actually goes on in these places, I recommend reading Slaughterhouse by Gail A. Eisnitz.   The truth is that human beings, at this point in time (what our ancestors did in the past is completely irrelevant), have no reason to consume other animals anymore, just like we have no real reason to continue using fossil fuels as energy sources. The difference, however, lies in the fact that people simply enjoy eating meat and do not want to give it up - not because it's unethical or harmful to the environment, but only because it tastes good. As a result, people resort to "guilt-free" options, and buy animal products with labels like "humane" or "free-range." However, these labels are completely arbitrary and are not regulated. There is no legal definition of "free-range" or "humane," and no common standard exists. Some eggs farmers consider their chickens free-range if their chickens live in slightly larger than average cages, or live in a shed with a window in it. Some "free-range" chickens never go outside, meaning you cannot determine the quality of the animal's life by these precarious labels. And like I said before, all these animals - factory farmed or not - are slaughtered in the same places.   The best solution to this issue is to simply not eat meat - at all. But some people get defensive, and begin to rationalize and make excuses, eating their free-range animals as if that's the be-all and end-all solution to this cruelty. People simply don't want to believe they're part of it. The best way to not be part of it is to not eat any meat at all.
"I hope you can see this, because I'm doing it as hard as I can"
I know, cause you're a whinny little bitch!!!
Given the way monetarist policies have played out in history for example, Thatcher-esque UK, how do you personally resolve history with your positions on sound money?
Man I hope it's Google, I can't begin to think the evil plans AT&amp;T and Verizon might come up with if they win.
So? That's not a requirement for a religion.
old Tibetan saying: if you can change things, why worry? If you cannot, what's the point of worrying?
Holy mother of god.  After all this time, we both think the sales tax tends to be regressive?  That your whole point was that "sales taxes are regressive" isn't precisely accurate, and that *tends* is a more accurate choice of words?  This is a very subtle distinction. You could have said this outright and saved both of us a ton of time. That I used "is" instead of "tends" doesn't seem to justify your intial claims that I don't know anything about economics and am just parroting what I was told. In case you are interested, I wrote my doctoral thesis on tax policy, btw.
I am a team-playing Democrat mostly because I think the prospect of McCain or Romney or Huckabee in the WH is scarier than any of the dems, so if I felt that speaking up about Obama was damaging to him (thinking of the GE here) I would stop, but I think it's good practice for his supporters to learn how to defend their candidate and think about and articulate why they are supporting him.   Sadly, I have not gotten very good responses for the most part. It's turned into another "b-b-b-but Clinton!" argument. They're doing all the work for the GOP by using every right-wing talking point they can find against Hillary. I don't like Hillary either and if she were getting hyped-up the way Obama is I can guarantee you I would be pointing out her flaws, too (but I don't need to, do I?). Calling her Hitlery, saying she'll be just as bad as any Republican, etc. is just going to screw us all over if she ends up being the Dem nom. This is also why I down-vote every RW talking point against Obama (although there are unsettlingly few floating around...good sign or bad?).   If his supporters can't get their shit together, figure out concise, clear, and factual ways to defend his policy and other flaws (yes, he has them), and spend more time actually defending him rather than trying to bring down Clinton, we're in for a world of trouble come the GE. Rasmussen's latest poll shows McCain beating both of them (which is apt to change, yes) so they SHOULD be spending their time focusing on how to fight off the GOP and instead they are running around the net calling ME and anyone else who points out that Obama is not perfect all kinds of utter bullshit (racist, for one).   They are not going to win the GE by talking about how much worse Hillary would have been and they're going to get blind-sided if they don't figure this out soon. 
Oh, I'm sorry, let me try again:  LOLZ, this guy is like t0tally write, stoopid m$ with their winblowz.. lols, see wat i did there?haahaahlmfao  How'd I go that time? Did I capture the essence of many Reddit user's views on Microsoft? Should I say something derogatory about Bill Gates?
Reddit is censoring me... It's pissing me off... Look at my submissions, I've been trying to submit a link to the damn enhanced version of the Romney whisper. My shit never shows up on the new page. The proof is there. Does everyone already know the full audible whisper was "...(Reagan) raised taxes, I'm not gonna..."? This pretty much rules out the Russert prompt theory and explains MSNBC's bizarre original denial.  Their first explanation was that Mitt's mic had temporarily malfunctioned, which might have been the case, but it sure as hell wasn't Mitt talking. The full audible whisper reveals a complete answer to Russert's 'trick' question, an answer Romney happened to use.  http://andrewsullivan.theatlantic.com/the_daily_dish/2008/01/romney-whispe-1.html?
Yea, now that I look back, I think I was just high. Nothing to see here folks, just move along.
